Statutes and Regulations Pharmacy January 2004 NOTE: The official version of the statutes in this document is printed in the Alaska Statutes, copyrighted by the State of Alaska.
The official version of the regulations in this document is published in the Alaska Administrative Code, copyrighted by the State of Alaska.
If any discrepancies are found between this document and the official versions, the official versions will apply.
TABLE OF CONTENTS Page Section 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
Pharmacy Act (AS 08.80) ...................................................................1 Board of Pharmacy Regulations (12 AAC 52) .......................................................................................9 Centralized Licensing Statutes (AS 08.01 ­ AS 08.03) ......................................................................30 Occupational Licensing Regulations and Fees (12 AAC 02) .....................................................................................38 (Controlled Substances Act (AS 17.30) ............................................44
Appendix A: Sterile Pharmaceuticals .........................................................49 Appendix B: Facility Standards for Pharmacies .........................................52 Appendix C: Good Compounding Practices ..............................................53
CHAPTER 80.
PHARMACISTS AND PHARMACIES.
Article 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
The Board of Pharmacy (§§ 08.80.003 - 08.80.105) Licensing and Registration (§§ 08.80.110 - 08.80.261) Duties of Licensed Pharmacists (§§ 08.80.295 - 08.80.330) Unlawful Acts (§§ 08.80.390 - 08.80.460) General Provisions (§§ 08.80.470 - 08.80.490) Article 1.
The Board of Pharmacy.
Section 03.
05.
10.
30.
45.
50.
60.
70.
80.
105.
Practice of pharmacy as a profession Statement of purpose Creation and membership of board; officers Powers and duties of the board Nonprescription drugs Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act Meetings of the board Quorum Expenses of members Removal of board members
Sec. 08.80.003.
PRACTICE OF PHARMACY AS A PROFESSION.
The practice of pharmacy is declared to be a professional practice affecting the public health, safety, and welfare and is subject to regulation and control in the public interest.
It is further declared to be a matter of public interest that only qualified persons be permitted to engage in the practice of pharmacy, and to ensure the quality of drugs and related devices distributed in the state.
Sec. 08.80.005.
STATEMENT OF PURPOSE.
It is the purpose of this chapter to promote, preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare by and through the effective control and regulation of the practice of pharmacy.
Sec. 08.80.010.
CREATION AND MEMBERSHIP OF BOARD; OFFICERS.
(a) There is created the Board of Pharmacy, composed of seven members, five of whom shall be pharmacists licensed in the state who have been actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy in the state for a period of three years immediately preceding their appointment.
Two shall be persons with no direct financial interest in the health care industry.
Whenever possible, the board shall include at least one member from each judicial district.
(b) An officer elected by the board serves a term of one year and may not serve more than four consecutive full terms in a specific office.
Sec. 08.80.030.
POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD.
(a) The board is responsible for the control and regulation of the practice of pharmacy.
(b) In order to fulfill its responsibilities, the board has the powers necessary for implementation and enforcement of this chapter, including the power to (1) elect a president and secretary from its membership and adopt rules for the conduct of its business; (2) license by examination or by license transfer the applicants who are qualified to engage in the practice of pharmacy; (3) assist the department in inspections and investigations for violations of this chapter, or of any other state or federal statute relating to the practice of pharmacy; (4) adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter; (5) establish and enforce compliance with professional standards and rules of conduct for pharmacists engaged in the practice of pharmacy; (6) determine standards for recognition and approval of degree programs of schools and colleges of pharmacy whose graduates shall be eligible for licensure in this state, including the specification and enforcement of requirements for practical training, including internships; (7) establish for pharmacists and pharmacies minimum specifications for the physical facilities, technical equipment, personnel, and procedures for the storage, compounding, and dispensing of drugs or related devices, and for the monitoring of drug therapy; (8) enforce the provisions of this chapter relating to the conduct or competence of pharmacists practicing in the state, and the suspension, revocation, or restriction of licenses to engage in the practice of pharmacy; (9) license and regulate the training, qualifications, and employment of pharmacy interns and pharmacy technicians; (10) issue licenses to persons engaged in the manufacture and distribution of drugs and related devices.
-1-
Sec. 08.80.045.
NONPRESCRIPTION DRUGS.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section the board may not regulate the sale of patent or nonprescription drugs that are prepackaged for use by the consumer, are in their original, unbroken packaging, and are labeled in accordance with requirements of the federal government.
(b) The board may regulate the sale and distribution of patent or nonprescription drugs under AS 44.62.250 when the regulation is required by an emergency to protect the public health and safety.
Sec. 08.80.050.
APPLICABILITY OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT.
The board shall comply with the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62).
Sec. 08.80.060.
MEETINGS OF THE BOARD.
The board shall meet at least three times each year at the call of the president for the transaction of business properly before it.
The president shall also call the board into session when requested in writing by at least two members.
Meetings may be held telephonically.
Sec. 08.80.070.
QUORUM.
Four members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
However, when the board meets for the purpose of examining applications for licensure, three members of the board constitute a quorum.
Sec. 08.80.080.
EXPENSES OF MEMBERS.
Members of the board are entitled to reimbursement for actual travel expenses incidental to the discharge of their duties and, while in the performance of their duties, are entitled to the per diem expenses allowed by law.
Sec. 08.80.105.
REMOVAL OF BOARD MEMBERS.
A member of the board may be removed from office by the governor for cause.
Article 2.
Licensing and Registration.
Section 110.
116.
120.
145.
147.
150.
155.
157.
158.
160.
165.
261.
Qualifications for licensure by examination Internship and other training programs Grading and content of examination Reciprocity; license transfer Renewal of licensure Temporary license Emergency permit Licensing of facilities Registration of pharmacies located outside of state Fees Continuing education requirements Disciplinary sanctions
Sec. 08.80.110.
QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE BY EXAMINATION.
An applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall (1) be fluent in the reading, writing, and speaking of the English language; (2) furnish the board with at least two affidavits from reputable citizens that the applicant has known for at least one year attesting to the applicant's good moral character; (3) be a graduate of a college in a degree program approved by the board; (4) pass an examination or examinations given by the board or acceptable to the board under the score transfer process administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy; (5) have completed internship training or another program that has been approved by the board or demonstrated to the board's satisfaction that the applicant has experience in the practice of pharmacy that meets or exceeds the minimum internship requirements of the board.
Sec. 08.80.116.
INTERNSHIP AND OTHER TRAINING PROGRAMS.
(a) An applicant for licensure by examination shall obtain practical experience in the practice of pharmacy concurrent with or after college attendance, or both, under terms and conditions the board shall determine.
(b) The board shall establish licensure requirements for interns and standards for internship or other training programs that are necessary to qualify an applicant for the licensure examination and shall also determine the qualifications of preceptors used in practical experience programs.
Sec. 08.80.120.
GRADING AND CONTENT OF EXAMINATION.
The examination or examinations shall be prepared to measure the competence of the applicant to engage in the practice of pharmacy.
The board may employ, cooperate, and contract with an organization or consultant in the preparation and grading of an examination, but shall retain sole discretion and responsibility for determining which applicants have successfully passed the examinations.
-2-
Sec. 08.80.145.
RECIPROCITY; LICENSE TRANSFER.
If another jurisdiction allows licensure in that jurisdiction of a pharmacist licensed in this state under conditions similar to those in this section, the board may license as a pharmacist in this state a person licensed as a pharmacist in the other jurisdiction if the person (1) submits a written application to the board on a form required by the board; (2) is at least 18 years of age; (3) is of good moral character; (4) possesses at the time of the request for licensure as a pharmacist in this state the qualifications necessary to be eligible for licensure in this state; (5) has engaged in the practice of pharmacy for at least one year or has met the internship requirements of this state within the one-year period immediately before applying for a license under this section; (6) presents proof satisfactory to the board that the person is currently licensed as a pharmacist in the other jurisdiction and does not currently have a pharmacist license suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted except for failure to apply for renewal or failure to obtain the required continuing education credits; (7) has passed an examination approved by the board that tests the person's knowledge of Alaska laws relating to pharmacies and pharmacists and the regulations adopted under those laws; and (8) pays all required fees.
Sec. 08.80.147.
RENEWAL OF LICENSURE.
If a pharmacist fails to apply for renewal of a license within five years from the expiration of the license, the person must pass an examination for license renewal, except that a person who has continually practiced pharmacy in another state under a license issued by the authority of that state may renew an expired license in this state upon fulfillment of the requirements that may be established by the board.
Sec. 08.80.150.
TEMPORARY LICENSE.
The board shall adopt regulations regarding the issuance of a temporary license to practice pharmacy.
Sec. 08.80.155.
EMERGENCY PERMIT.
The board shall adopt regulations regarding the issuance of an emergency permit to practice pharmacy.
Sec. 08.80.157.
LICENSING OF FACILITIES.
(a) A facility engaged in the practice of pharmacy or in the manufacture, production, or wholesale distribution of drugs or devices, and a pharmacy where drugs or devices are dispensed, shall be licensed by the board, and shall renew the license at intervals determined by the board.
If operations are conducted at more than one location, each location shall be licensed by the board.
(b) The board may by regulation determine the licensure classifications of facilities and establish minimum standards for the facilities.
(c) The board shall establish by regulation the criteria that a facility must meet to qualify for licensure in each classification.
The board may issue licenses with varying restrictions to facilities when the board considers it necessary to protect the public interest.
(d) The board may deny or refuse to renew a license if it determines that the granting or renewing of the license would not be in the public interest.
(e) Licenses issued by the board are not transferable or assignable.
(f) The board shall specify by regulation the minimum standards for responsibility of a facility or pharmacy that has employees or personnel engaged in the practice of pharmacy or engaged in the manufacture, wholesale distribution, production, or use of drugs or devices in the conduct of its business.
(g) A licensed facility shall report to the board (1) permanent closing; (2) change of ownership, management, location, or pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy; (3) theft or loss of drugs or devices as defined by regulations of the board; (4) conviction of an employee of violation of a state or federal drug law; (5) disasters, accidents, theft, destruction, or loss relating to records required to be maintained by state or federal law; (6) occurrences of significant adverse drug reactions as defined by regulations of the board; (7) other matters and occurrences the board may require by regulation.
(h) The board may suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew the license of a facility or pharmacy on the following grounds: (1) the finding by the board of violations of a federal, state, or local law relating to the practice of pharmacy, drug samples, wholesale or retail drug or device distribution, or distribution of controlled substances; (2) a felony conviction under federal, state, or local law of an owner of the facility or pharmacy or of an employee of the facility or pharmacy; (3) the furnishing of false or fraudulent material in an application made in connection with drug or device manufacturing or distribution; (4) suspension or revocation by federal, state, or local government of a license currently or previously held by the applicant for the manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices, including controlled substances; (5) obtaining remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation, or deception; (6) dealing with drugs or devices that are known or should have been known to be stolen drugs or devices;
-3-
(7) dispensing or distributing drugs or devices directly to patients by a wholesale drug distributor other than a pharmacy; (8) violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.
(i) The board's regulations under (b) - (d) and (f) of this section may not establish more stringent licensing requirements for the facilities governed by AS 08.80.390 than are set out in AS 08.80.390.
(j) This section does not apply to the offices of physicians, osteopaths, podiatrists, physician assistants, advanced nurse practitioners, dentists, veterinarians, dispensing opticians, or optometrists.
Sec. 08.80.158.
REGISTRATION OF PHARMACIES LOCATED OUTSIDE OF STATE.
(a) A pharmacy located outside of the state that regularly ships, mails, or delivers prescription drugs to consumers in the state shall register with the board.
(b) A pharmacy registering with the board under (a) of this section shall furnish to the board annually (1) the location, names, and titles of all principal corporate officers and of all pharmacists who are dispensing prescription drugs to residents of the state; (2) a copy of a current valid license, permit, or registration to conduct operations in the jurisdiction in which it is located, and a copy of the most recent report resulting from an inspection of the pharmacy by the regulatory or licensing agency of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located; (3) a sworn statement indicating that the pharmacy complies with all lawful directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing authority of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is licensed; and (4) proof satisfactory to the board that the pharmacy maintains its records of prescription drugs dispensed to persons in the state so that the records are readily retrievable from the records of other prescription drugs dispensed by the pharmacy.
(c) A pharmacy subject to this section shall, during its regular hours of operations, provide a toll-free telephone service to facilitate communication between persons in the state and a pharmacist at the pharmacy who has access to records concerning the dispensing of prescription drugs to persons in the state.
The toll-free number and the hours that the service is available shall be disclosed on a label affixed to each container of drugs dispensed to persons in the state.
The telephone service shall be available at least 40 hours a week and at least six days a week.
(d) The board may, after a hearing, deny, revoke, or suspend the registration of a pharmacy located outside of the state and subject to this section if the pharmacy fails to comply with the requirements of this section, AS 17.20.080 - AS 17.20.135, or AS 17.30.020 - 17.30.080, or if the license, permit, or registration of the pharmacy is denied, revoked, or suspended by the licensing or regulatory agency of the jurisdiction in which the pharmacy is located.
(e) A pharmacy located outside of the state that is subject to this section but is not registered with the board under this section may not ship, mail, or deliver prescription drugs into the state and may not advertise its services in the state.
(f) A pharmacy subject to this section shall appoint a registered agent in the state who is empowered to accept, on behalf of the pharmacy, process, notice, and demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the pharmacy.
If the pharmacy fails to appoint an agent under this subsection, if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or if the registration of the pharmacy is suspended or revoked, the commissioner of commerce and economic development is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served.
Service is made upon the commissioner in the same manner as provided for corporations under AS 10.06.175(b), except that for the purposes of AS 10.06.175(b)(2)(A), the address shall be the last registered address of the pharmacy as shown by the records of the board.
(g) The board shall by regulation define "regularly" for this section.
Sec. 08.80.160.
FEES.
The Department of Community and Economic Development shall set fees under AS 08.01.065 for the following: (1) examination; (2) reexamination; (3) investigation for licensing by license transfer; (4) pharmacist license; (5) temporary license; (6) pharmacy technician license; (7) pharmacy intern license; (8) emergency permit; (9) license amendment or replacement; (10) registration or licensure of a facility classified under AS 08.80.157(b).
Sec. 08.80.165.
CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS.
The board shall establish requirements for continuing education in pharmacy that must be satisfied before a license issued under this chapter may be renewed.
Sec. 08.80.261.
DISCIPLINARY SANCTIONS.
(a) The board may deny a license to an applicant or, after a hearing, impose a disciplinary sanction authorized under AS 08.01.075 on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the applicant or licensee, as applicable, (1) secured or attempted to secure a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;
-4-
(2) engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities; (3) advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner; (4) has been convicted of a felony or has been convicted of another crime that affects the applicant's or licensee's ability to practice competently and safely; (5) intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the applicant's or licensee's supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred; (6) failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board; (7) is incapable of engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety for the public because of (A) professional incompetence; (B) failure to keep informed of or use current professional theories or practices; (C) addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that impairs the applicant's or licensee's ability to practice safely; (D) physical or mental disability; or (E) other factors determined by the board; (8) engaged in conduct involving moral turpitude or gross immorality; (9) made a controlled substance available to a person except upon prescription issued by a person licensed to prescribe controlled substances; (10) was convicted of selling federal legend drugs without the prescription of a person licensed to prescribe federal legend drugs; (11) violated state or federal laws or regulations pertaining to drugs or pharmacies; (12) failed to report relevant information to the board about a pharmacist or pharmacy intern that the applicant or licensee knew or suspected was incapable of engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public; (13) aided another person to engage in the practice of pharmacy or to use the title of "pharmacist" or "pharmacy intern" without a license; or (14) engaged in unprofessional conduct, as defined in regulations of the board.
(b) The board may place under seal all drugs that are owned by or in the possession, custody, or control of a licensee at the time a license is suspended or revoked or at the time the board refuses to renew a license.
Except for perishable items, the drugs may not be disposed of until the licensee has exhausted administrative and judicial remedies relating to the licensing action.
Perishable items may be sold upon order of the court with the proceeds to be deposited with the court.
The board shall notify the Department of Health and Social Services about drugs placed under seal under this subsection.
Article 3.
Duties of Licensed Pharmacists.
Section 295.
297.
315.
330.
Substitution of equivalent drug products Prescription prices available to consumer Confidentiality of records Licensed pharmacist appointed as "pharmacist-in-charge"
Sec. 08.80.295.
SUBSTITUTION OF EQUIVALENT DRUG PRODUCTS.
(a) Unless the prescription indicates that it is to be dispensed only as written, the pharmacist may, with the consent of the patient, substitute an equivalent drug product.
(b) A pharmacist who substitutes an equivalent drug product in compliance with this section and applicable regulations incurs no greater liability in filling the prescription than would be incurred in filling the prescription by dispensing the prescribed name brand product.
Sec. 08.80.297.
PRESCRIPTION PRICES AVAILABLE TO CONSUMER.
A pharmacist shall disclose the price of filling any prescription when requested by the consumer.
Sec. 08.80.315.
CONFIDENTIALITY OF patient's records or that is communicated to the released only to (1) the patient or as the patient directs; (2) a practitioner or pharmacist when, in protect the patient's health and well-being; and (3) other persons or governmental agencies RECORDS.
Information maintained by a pharmacist in the patient as part of patient counseling is confidential and may be the pharmacist's professional judgment, release is necessary to authorized by law to receive confidential information.
-5-
Sec. 08.80.330.
LICENSED PHARMACIST APPOINTED AS "PHARMACIST-IN-CHARGE". (a) Each pharmacy shall have a pharmacist-in-charge.
Whenever an applicable law or regulation requires or prohibits action by a pharmacy, responsibility shall be that of the owner and the pharmacist-in-charge, whether the owner is a sole proprietor, partnership, association, corporation, or otherwise.
The pharmacist-in-charge shall ensure compliance with all laws and regulations governing the operation of the pharmacy.
A licensed pharmacist appointed as pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy shall immediately advise the board of that appointment.
(b) A license may not be issued to a pharmacy unless there is a licensed registered pharmacist-in-charge whose name appears on the face of the license.
Article 4.
Unlawful Acts.
Section 390.
400.
410.
420.
430.
450.
460.
Pharmacists required in hospitals and clinics Other licensees not affected Use of term "pharmacist" prohibited Certain advertising prohibited Use of pharmacy symbols prohibited Disciplinary action Penalties
Sec. 08.80.390.
PHARMACISTS REQUIRED IN HOSPITALS AND CLINICS.
(a) A hospital, clinic, nursing home, infirmary, or related facility that dispenses drugs for outpatient treatment shall have a licensed pharmacist in charge of the dispensary, except that prescriptions may be compounded and dispensed by or under the supervision of the prescribing physician.
(b) The board shall issue a license to a hospital drug room, nursing home drug room, or related facility that dispenses drugs from bulk supply for inpatient treatment, providing the facility employs a licensed pharmacist on a continual or consultant basis.
Sec. 08.80.400.
OTHER LICENSEES NOT AFFECTED.
This chapter does not affect the practice of medicine by a licensed medical doctor, and does not limit a licensed medical doctor, osteopath, podiatrist, physician assistant, advanced nurse practitioner, dentist, veterinarian, dispensing optician, or optometrist in supplying a patient with any medicinal preparation or article within the scope of the person's license.
Sec. 08.80.410.
USE OF TERM "PHARMACIST" PROHIBITED.
A person may not assume or use the title "pharmacist," or any variation of the title, or hold out to be a pharmacist, without being licensed.
Sec. 08.80.420.
CERTAIN ADVERTISING PROHIBITED.
(a) A person may not use or exhibit the title "pharmacist," "assistant pharmacist," or "druggist," or the descriptive term "pharmacy," "drug store," "drug sundries," or other similar title or term containing the word "drug," in any business premises, or in an advertisement through the media of press, or publication, or by radio or television, unless the business has a licensed pharmacist in regular and continuous employment.
(b) Repealed 1980.
Sec. 08.80.430.
USE OF PHARMACY SYMBOLS PROHIBITED.
A person may not display in a place of business the characteristic pharmacy symbol of "Rx" in any form unless the business has a pharmacist licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 08.80.450.
DISCIPLINARY ACTION.
The board may consider a complaint based upon the alleged violation of any provision of this chapter, and may by a majority vote of a quorum dismiss the complaint, reprimand a licensee, or take other punitive action as the nature of the facts warrant.
Orders issued by the board shall be in writing, signed by a majority and filed with the secretary of the board.
The accused shall receive an authenticated copy of the order.
Sec. 08.80.460.
PENALTIES.
(a) A person who violates a provision of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who violates the provisions of AS 08.80.295 is punishable by a civil fine in an amount established by the board in a schedule or schedules establishing the amount of civil fine for a particular violation.
The schedule or schedules shall be adopted by the board by regulation.
Any civil fine imposed under this section may be appealed in the manner provided for appeals in the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62).
-6-
Article 5.
General Provisions.
Section 470.
475.
480.
490.
Construction Federal facilities not affected Definitions Short title
Sec. 08.80.470.
CONSTRUCTION.
Nothing in this chapter amends, modifies, repeals or otherwise changes any provision of AS 11.71, AS 17.30, or AS 17.20 (the Alaska Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act).
Sec. 08.80.475.
FEDERAL FACILITIES NOT AFFECTED.
This chapter does not apply to the safe storage, preservation, dispensing, or control of drugs in a federally operated hospital or institution.
Sec. 08.80.480.
DEFINITIONS.
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires (1) "administer" means the direct application of a drug to the body of a patient or research subject by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or other means; (2) "board" means the Board of Pharmacy; (3) "compounding" means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging, or labeling of a drug or device (A) as the result of a practitioner's prescription drug order or initiative based on the relationship of the practitioner, patient, and pharmacist in the course of professional practice or (B) for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale or dispensing; "compounding" also includes the preparation of drugs or devices in anticipation of prescription drug orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns; (4) "controlled substance" has the meaning given in AS 11.71.900; (5) "deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer of a drug or device from one person to another, whether or not for consideration; (6) "device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, or other similar or related article, including a component part or accessory, that is required under federal law to bear the label "Caution: Federal or state law requires dispensing by or on the order of a physician"; (7) "dispense" or "dispensing" means the preparation and delivery of a drug or device to a patient or patient's agent under a lawful order of a practitioner in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to, or use by, a patient; (8) "distribute" means the delivery of a drug or device other than by administering or dispensing; (9) "drug" means an article recognized as a drug in an official compendium, or supplement to an official compendium; an article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animal; an article other than food, intended to affect the structure or function of the body of man or animal; and an article intended for use as a component of an article specified in this paragraph but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories; (10) "drug regimen review" includes evaluation of the prescription drug order and patient record for (A) known allergies; (B) rational therapy-contraindications; (C) reasonable dose and route of administration; (D) reasonable directions for use; (E) duplication of therapy; (F) drug-drug, drug-food, and drug-disease interactions; (G) adverse drug reactions; and (H) proper utilization, including over- or under-utilization, and optimum therapeutic outcomes; (11) "equivalent drug product" means a drug product that has the same established name, active ingredients, strength or concentration, dosage form, and route of administration and that is formulated to contain the same amount of active ingredients in the same dosage form and to meet the same compendia or other applicable standards for strength, quality, purity, and identity, but that may differ in characteristics such as shape, scoring configuration, packaging, excipients including colors, flavors, preservatives, and expiration time; (12) "intern" means an individual who is (A) currently licensed by this state to engage in the practice of pharmacy while under the personal supervision of a pharmacist and is satisfactorily progressing toward meeting the requirements for licensure as a pharmacist; or (B) a graduate from a college of pharmacy who is currently licensed by the board for the purpose of obtaining practical experience as a requirement for licensure as a pharmacist; (13) "labeling" means the process of preparing and affixing a label to a drug container, exclusive, however, of the labeling by a manufacturer, packer, or distributor or a nonprescription drug or commercially packed legend drug or device; (14) "legend drug" means a prescription drug; (15) "manufacturing" means the production, preparation, propagation, conversion, or processing of a drug or device, either directly or indirectly, by extraction from a substance of natural origin or independently by means of chemical or biological synthesis, and includes packaging or repackaging of a substance or labeling or relabeling of
-7-
its container, and the promotion and marketing of drugs or devices; "manufacturing" also includes the preparation and promotion of commercially available products from bulk compounds for resale by pharmacies, practitioners, or other persons; (16) "nonprescription drug" means a nonnarcotic medicine or drug that may be sold without a prescription and that is prepackaged for use by the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the statutes and regulations of the state and the federal government; (17) "outpatient dispensing" means dispensing drugs for administration outside of the hospital pharmacy's control; (18) "owner" means the owner of a place of business for wholesaling, retailing, compounding, or dispensing drugs, medicines, or poisons; (19) "patient counseling" means the communication by the pharmacist of information, as defined in the regulations of the board, to the patient or care giver in order to improve therapy by ensuring proper use of drugs and devices; (20) "person" has the meaning given in AS 01.10.060 and also includes a governmental agency; (21) "pharmaceutical care" is the provision of drug therapy and other pharmaceutical patient care services intended to achieve outcomes related to the cure or prevention of a disease, elimination or reduction of a patient's symptoms, or arresting or slowing of a disease process as defined in regulations of the board; (22) "pharmacist" means an individual currently licensed by this state to engage in the practice of pharmacy; (23) "pharmacist-in-charge" means a pharmacist who accepts responsibility for operation of a pharmacy in a manner that complies with laws and regulations applicable to the practice of pharmacy and the distribution of drugs and who is personally in charge of the pharmacy and the pharmacy's personnel; (24) "pharmacy" means a place in this state where drugs are dispensed and pharmaceutical care is provided and a place outside of this state that is subject to licensure or registration under AS 08.80.157(b); (25) "pharmacy located outside of the state" means a pharmacy that prepares or mixes prescription drugs outside of the state, regardless of the location at which those drugs may be shipped, mailed, or delivered to the consumer; (26) "pharmacy technician" means a supportive staff member who works under the immediate supervision of a pharmacist; (27) "practice of pharmacy" means the interpretation, evaluation, and dispensing of prescription drug orders in the patient's best interest; participation in drug and device selection, drug administration, drug regimen reviews, and drug or drug-related research; provision of patient counseling and the provision of those acts or services necessary to provide pharmaceutical care; and the responsibility for: compounding and labeling of drugs and devices except labeling by a manufacturer, repackager, or distributor of nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend drugs and devices; proper and safe storage of drugs and devices; and maintenance of proper records for them; (28) "practitioner" means an individual currently licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by the jurisdiction in which the individual practices to prescribe and administer drugs in the course of professional practice; (29) "preceptor" means an individual who is currently licensed by the board, meets the qualifications as a preceptor under the regulations of the board, and participates in the instructional training of pharmacy interns; (30) "prescription drug" means a drug that, under federal law, before being dispensed or delivered, is required to be labeled with either of the following statements: (A) "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription"; (B) "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by, or on the order of, a licensed veterinarian"; or a drug that is required by an applicable federal or state law or regulation to be dispensed only under a prescription drug order or is restricted to use by practitioners only; (31) "prescription drug order" means a lawful order of a practitioner for a drug or device for a specific patient; (32) "prospective drug use review" means a review of the patient's drug therapy and prescription drug order, as defined in the regulations of the board, before dispensing the drug as part of a drug regimen review; (33) "significant adverse drug reaction" means a drug-related incident that may result in serious harm, injury, or death to the patient; (34) "substitution" means to dispense without the prescriber's expressed authorization, an equivalent drug product in place of the prescribed drug; (35) "wholesale" means sale by a manufacturer, wholesale dealer, distributor, or jobber to a person who sells, or intends to sell, directly to the user: (36) "wholesale drug distributor" means anyone engaged in wholesale distribution of drugs, including but not limited to manufacturers; repackagers; own-label distributors; private label distributors; jobbers; brokers; warehouses, including manufacturers' and distributors' warehouses; chain drug warehouses; wholesale drug warehouses; independent wholesale drug traders; and retail pharmacies that conduct wholesale distributions.
Sec. 08.80.490.
Short title.
This chapter may be known as the Pharmacy Act.
-8-
CHAPTER 52.
BOARD OF PHARMACY.
Article 1.
Licensing, Registration, and Permit Requirements (12 AAC 52.010 - 12 AAC 52.140) 2.
Personnel (12 AAC 52.200 - 12 AAC 52.230) 3.
License Renewal and Continuing Education Requirements (12 AAC 52.300 - 12 AAC 52.350) 4.
Guidelines for Pharmacies and Pharmacists (12 AAC 52.400 - 12 AAC 52.440) 5.
Pharmacy Practice Standards (12 AAC 52.450 - 12 AAC 52.590) 6.
Wholesale Drug Distributors and Facilities (12 AAC 52.610 - 12 AAC 52.695) 7.
Institutional Pharmacies (12 AAC 52.700 - 12 AAC 52.730) 8.
Drug Rooms and Facilities Without a Pharmacy (12 AAC 52.800 - 12 AAC 52.840) 9.
Disciplinary Guidelines (12 AAC 52.900 - 12 AAC 52.980) 10.
General Provisions (12 AAC 52.990 - 12 AAC 52.995) ARTICLE 1.
LICENSING, REGISTRATION, AND PERMIT REQUIREMENTS.
Section 10.
20.
30.
40.
50.
60.
70.
75.
80.
90.
100.
110.
120.
130.
140.
Classifications of licensure Facility license Change of pharmacy location or name Change of pharmacy ownership Closed pharmacies Fire or other disaster Education requirements for a pharmacist license Good moral character Internship requirements for a pharmacist license Examination requirements and registration Temporary pharmacist license Emergency pharmacist permit Pharmacist intern license Registration of pharmacies located outside of the state Pharmacy technician license
12 AAC 52.010.
CLASSIFICATIONS OF LICENSURE.
(a) The board will issue the following categories of licenses or permits to a qualified individual: (1) pharmacist license; (2) temporary pharmacist license; (3) emergency permit to practice pharmacy; (4) pharmacist intern license; (5) pharmacy technician license.
(b) The board will issue the following categories of licenses or registrations to a qualified facility: (1) pharmacy license; (2) repealed 2/26/2000; (3) wholesale drug distributor license; (4) drug room license; and (5) registration of a pharmacy located outside of the state.
12 AAC 52.020.
FACILITY LICENSE.
(a) An applicant for a facility license shall submit (1) the fees required in 12 AAC 02.310; (2) a completed application on a form provided by the department; (3) a completed self-inspection of the premises questionnaire on a form provided by the department; and (4) the name of the pharmacy or pharmacist that will provide consultant pharmacist services as required in AS 08.80.390, if applicable.
-9-
(b) The board will determine which category of facility license listed in 12 AAC 52.010(b) is issued to an applicant based on the information provided on the application form.
(c) An application for a pharmacy license must include the name of the pharmacist designated to be the pharmacist-in-charge as required in AS 08.80.330 and 12 AAC 52.200.
12 AAC 52.030.
CHANGE OF PHARMACY LOCATION OR NAME. (a) The pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy that has changed its name or physical address shall apply for a new and separate pharmacy license.
The applicant shall (1) submit a new, completed application for a pharmacy license; (2) pay the duplicate license fee required in 12 AAC 02.105; and (3) return the existing pharmacy license to the department.
(b) The pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy that has changed its physical address shall complete a selfinspection questionnaire before the pharmacy may begin operating in the new location.
12 AAC 52.040.
CHANGE OF PHARMACY OWNERSHIP.
(a) An owner of a pharmacy shall return the facility license to the department when ownership of the pharmacy is transferred.
(b) A new owner of a pharmacy shall apply for a new and separate facility license in accordance with 12 AAC 52.020.
12 AAC 52.050.
CLOSED PHARMACIES.
(a) When a pharmacy ceases operations, the pharmacist-in-charge of that pharmacy shall (1) submit to the board a written notice of the cessation of pharmacy operations; the written notice must be submitted within 10 days after the cessation of operations and include (A) the date the pharmacy ceased operations; (B) a statement signed by the pharmacist-in-charge attesting that an inventory of all controlled substances on hand has been conducted; and (C) a statement signed by the pharmacist-in-charge attesting to the manner of disposition for all prescription drugs possessed by the pharmacy; (2) arrange for the transfer of prescription drug orders or computer prescription records to another pharmacy to facilitate continuous patient care; (3) provide for the maintenance and availability of prescription drug orders or hard copies of computer prescription records in accordance with 12 AAC 52.450(a) that are not transferred to another pharmacy; and (4) return the facility license to the department within 30 days after meeting the requirements of this section.
(b) In the absence of a pharmacist-in-charge, the owner of the pharmacy shall meet all requirements of this section.
12 AAC 52.060.
FIRE OR OTHER DISASTER.
(a) If a pharmacy has a fire or other disaster, the pharmacistin-charge of the pharmacy shall (1) within 10 days, report to the board the date of a fire or any disaster that may affect the strength, purity, or labeling of drugs, devices, or other materials used in the practice of the pharmacy; (2) provide the board with a copy of a completed DEA Form 106, "Report of Theft or Loss of Controlled Substances," reporting the loss or destruction of controlled substances or DEA order forms; if the extent of the loss of controlled substances cannot be determined, the pharmacist-in-charge shall submit to the board a complete inventory of all remaining controlled substances and a statement, signed by the pharmacist-in-charge, attesting to the accuracy of the inventory; and (3) notify the board in writing within 10 days after any change in the pharmacy's address, including a move to a temporary location or a return to the pharmacy's permanent location.
(b) If a pharmacy maintains a temporary location for more than 90 days, the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy shall apply for a new and separate facility license as required in 12 AAC 52.030.
(c) A pharmacy may not dispense any drug that has been exposed to excessive heat, smoke, or other conditions that may have caused deterioration.
12 AAC 52.070.
EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR A PHARMACIST LICENSE.
An applicant for a pharmacist license shall submit documentation to the board that the applicant (1) has graduated and received a professional degree from a college of pharmacy accredited by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education; or (2) has graduated from a college of pharmacy recognized by and earned certification from the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee of the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy.
Editor's note: Information about accredited colleges of pharmacy may be obtained from the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education, 311 West Superior Street, Suite 502, Chicago, Illinois 60610.
Information about Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee certification and colleges recognized by that committee may be obtained from the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy, Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee, 700 Busse Highway, Park Ridge, IL 60068.
-10-
12 AAC 52.075.
GOOD MORAL CHARACTER.
As used in AS 08.80, "good moral character" includes not having been convicted of a felony or another crime within the five years before the date of application that affects the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy competently and safely.
12 AAC 52.080.
INTERNSHIP REQUIREMENTS FOR A PHARMACIST LICENSE.
(a) An applicant for a pharmacist license shall submit an affidavit signed by the applicant, on a form provided by the department, documenting completion of 1,500 hours of internship or experience in the practice of pharmacy.
(b) The board will accept as internship experience only internship hours completed under the direct supervision of a pharmacist licensed under AS 08.80 or the pharmacy licensing laws of another state.
(c) The board will accept no more than 1,000 hours of internship that the applicant completed in conjunction with the educational requirements at a college of pharmacy accredited by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education.
(d) An internship program in a nontraditional site, such as an industry sponsored program, must be approved by the board before the board will give any internship credit for the program.
12 AAC 52.090.
EXAMINATION REQUIREMENTS AND REGISTRATION.
(a) In addition to the requirements in AS 08.80.110, an applicant for a pharmacist license shall pass the (1) North American Pharmacy licensing examination (NAPLEX) administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy with a NAPLEX scaled score of 75 or above; and (2) Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination with a score of 75 percent or above.
(b) An applicant for a temporary pharmacist license shall pass the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination with a score of 75 percent or above.
(c) An applicant for a pharmacist license that has passed the NAPLEX examination in another licensing jurisdiction shall make arrangements for the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy to send verification of examination scores directly to the department.
(d) An applicant shall file with the department a completed application for a pharmacist license by examination and the application and examination fees established in 12 AAC 02.310 at least 60 days before the date of the examination.
(e) An applicant who has failed the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination specified in (f) of this section may not retake the examination for at least 30 days.
(f) The Multistate Pharmacy Jurisprudence Examination administered by the national Association of Boards of Pharmacy (NABP) is the examination adopted by the board as the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination.
An applicant shall satisfy all other license requirements within one year after passing the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination or retake the examination.
(g) An applicant applying for a pharmacy license by examination shall make application within one year of successfully passing the NAPLEX.
An applicant applying more than one year after passing the NAPLEX shall retake the NAPLEX or apply for a pharmacy license under AS 08.80.145.
12 AAC 52.100.
TEMPORARY PHARMACIST LICENSE.
(a) The board will issue a temporary pharmacist license to an applicant for licensure if the applicant (1) submits a completed application for licensure; (2) provides certified evidence of meeting the requirements in AS 08.80.110, AS 08.80.145, and this chapter; (3) repealed 2/26/2000; (4) provides for the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy (NABP) to notify the board that the applicant has submitted a preliminary application to NABP for license transfer; (5) pays the application fee, pharmacist license fee, and temporary license fee required in 12 AAC 02.310; (6) passes the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination with a score of 75 percent or above; and (7) has not been convicted of a felony or another crime within the five years before the date of application that affects the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy competently and safely.
(b) An applicant whose application for permanent licensure as a pharmacist has been denied by the board is not eligible to receive a temporary license.
(c) A temporary license is valid for six months, or until the next regular meeting of the board, whichever occurs first.
For good cause shown to the board's satisfaction, the board will extend a temporary license for a period not to exceed 60 days.
(d) A temporary license is not renewable. (e) An individual may not receive more than one temporary license.
12 AAC 52.110.
EMERGENCY PHARMACIST PERMIT.
(a) If the board determines that an emergency exists, the board will issue an emergency pharmacist permit for the purpose of providing coverage in a pharmacy that is temporarily without the services of a pharmacist due to death, illness, or other emergency circumstances, to an applicant who (1) submits a completed application for a pharmacist license; (2) pays the emergency permit fee required in 12 AAC 02.310; (3) submits a certified true copy of a current pharmacist license in good standing in another state; (4) passes the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination with a score of 75 percent or above; and
-11-
(5) has not been convicted of a felony or another crime within the five years before the date of application that affects the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy competently and safely.
(b) An emergency permit is valid for 60 days or until the emergency circumstances no longer exist, whichever is shorter.
(c) An applicant may not receive more than one emergency permit.
An emergency permit is not renewable.
12 AAC 52.120.
PHARMACIST INTERN LICENSE.
(a) The board will issue a pharmacist intern license to practice pharmacy as an intern to an individual who (1) applies on a form provided by the department; (2) pays the pharmacist intern license fee required in 12 AAC 02.310; (3) has (A) completed the third year of a five-year or six-year pharmacy curriculum in a college of pharmacy accredited by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education; or (B) graduated from a college of pharmacy recognized by and earned certification from the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee of the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy; and (4) has not been convicted of a felony or another crime within the five years before the date of application that affects the applicant's ability to practice as a pharmacy intern competently and safely.
(b) An intern license is valid for one year and may be renewed.
(c) An individual must be licensed by the board as an intern before beginning an internship in the state.
12 AAC 52.130.
REGISTRATION OF PHARMACIES LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE STATE.
A pharmacy located outside of the state that ships, mails, or delivers prescription drugs more than twice annually to individual patients in the state shall register with the board.
12 AAC 52.140.
PHARMACY TECHNICIAN LICENSE.
(a) An applicant who meets the requirements on the checklist set out in (b) of this section has demonstrated the necessary qualifications for a pharmacy technician license.
An applicant who does not meet the requirements on the checklist or whose responses on the form for application do not clearly show that the applicant is qualified to receive a pharmacy technician license will not be issued a license unless the board reviews the application and determines that the applicant meets the qualifications in this section for a pharmacy technician license.
(b) The following checklist is established by the board for review of an application for a pharmacy technician license; a pharmacy technician license will be issued to an applicant who (1) submits a completed form for application, including (A) the applicant's name, mailing address, and telephone number; and (B) the applicant's date of birth that shows the applicant is at least 18 years old; (2) certifies that the applicant has not been convicted within the five years before the date of application of a felony or another crime that affects the applicant's ability to perform the duties of a pharmacy technician safely and competently; (3) certifies that the applicant has earned a high school diploma or its equivalent and provides the name of the issuing institution and the date the diploma or its equivalent was issued; (4) certifies that the applicant is fluent in the reading, writing, and speaking of the English language; and (5) pays the pharmacy technician license fee established in 12 AAC 02.310.
(c) A pharmacy technician license expires on June 30 of even-numbered years and may be renewed.
ARTICLE 2.
PERSONNEL.
Section 200.
210.
220.
230.
240.
Pharmacist-in-charge Pharmacist duties Pharmacist interns Pharmacy technicians Pharmacist collaborative practice authority
12 AAC 52.200.
PHARMACIST-IN-CHARGE.
(a) Before the board will issue a license to a pharmacy, the owner of the pharmacy must designate a pharmacist who practices in that pharmacy location as the pharmacist-incharge of the pharmacy in accordance with AS 08.80.330.
The board will indicate the name of the pharmacist-incharge on the face of the pharmacy license.
(b) The responsibilities of the pharmacist-in-charge include (1) compliance with all laws and regulations governing the activities of the pharmacy; (2) training of all pharmacy personnel; (3) establishing policies and procedures for pharmacy operations; (4) maintaining required records; (5) storage of all materials, including drugs and chemicals; (6) establishing and maintaining effective controls against theft or diversion of prescription drugs; and
-12-
(7) on request, reporting to the board the names of all pharmacists employed by the pharmacy.
(c) A pharmacist designated to replace the pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy shall notify the board within 10 days of that designation.
12 AAC 52.210.
PHARMACIST DUTIES.
Except as provided in 12 AAC 52.220, the following duties may be performed only by a pharmacist: (1) receiving an oral prescription drug order, including refill approval or denial that includes any change to the original prescription drug order; (2) consulting with a prescriber regarding a patient or prescription; (3) interpreting a prescription drug order; (4) determining the product required for a prescription; (5) interpreting data in a patient medication record system; (6) making a final check on all aspects of a completed prescription and assuming the responsibility for a filled prescription, including the accuracy of the drug prescribed and of the prescribed drug's strength, labeling, and proper container; and (7) consulting with a patient or a patient's agent regarding a prescription or information contained in the patient medication record system.
12 AAC 52.220.
PHARMACIST INTERNS.
(a) A pharmacist intern may not represent that the pharmacist intern is a pharmacist.
Only a person licensed by the board as a pharmacist intern may take, use, or exhibit the title of pharmacist intern or any other similar term.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this section, a pharmacist intern may perform any duty of a pharmacist under the direct supervision of a pharmacist.
(c) A pharmacist intern may not sign or initial any document that is required to be signed or initialed by a pharmacist unless the supervising pharmacist also signs or initials the document.
(d) A pharmacist intern shall file with the board a report of work experience on a form provided by the department at least once every six months.
(e) A pharmacist supervising a pharmacist intern (1) must be licensed as a pharmacist and be in good standing with the board; (2) shall provide direct supervision to an intern during professional activities throughout the entire period of the internship; (3) shall physically review prescription drug orders and the dispensed product before delivery of a product to the patient or the patient's agent; (4) is responsible for the work of the pharmacist intern; (5) may supervise more than one pharmacist intern; more than one pharmacist intern may not dispense simultaneously under the direct supervision of the same supervising pharmacist.
12 AAC 52.230.
PHARMACY TECHNICIANS.
(a) The following persons must be licensed as a pharmacy technician: (1) any individual who assists in performing manipulative, nondiscretionary functions associated with the practice of pharmacy; and (2) a supportive staff member assigned to work in the dispensing area of a pharmacy, including a cashier or a bookkeeper.
(b) A pharmacy technician shall work under the direct supervision of a person who is licensed as a pharmacist.
(c) A pharmacy technician may not perform any of the duties listed in 12 AAC 52.210.
(d) An individual working as a pharmacy technician shall wear an identification badge that shows the individual's name and identifies the individual as a pharmacy technician.
(e) Before an individual may regularly perform the tasks of a pharmacy technician, the individual shall complete training required by the pharmacist-in-charge.
Duties performed by the pharmacy technician must be consistent with the training the pharmacy technician has received.
(f) If a pharmacy technician will assist in the preparation of sterile pharmaceuticals, including parenteral medications, the pharmacy technician must have completed a minimum of 40 hours of on-the-job training in the preparation, sterilization, aseptic technique, and admixture of parenteral and other sterile pharmaceuticals before the pharmacy technician may regularly perform those tasks.
12 AAC 52.240.
PHARMACIST COLLABORATIVE PRACTICE AUTHORITY.
(a) A pharmacist planning to exercise collaborative practice authority in the pharmacist's practice by initiating or modifying drug therapy in accordance with a written protocol established and approved for the pharmacist's practice by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs under AS 08 must submit the completed written protocol to the board and be approved by the board before implementation.
(b) A written protocol must include (1) an agreement in which practitioners authorized to prescribe legend drugs in this state authorize pharmacists licensed in this state to administer or dispense in accordance with that written protocol; (2) a statement identifying the practitioners authorized to prescribe and the pharmacists who are party to the agreement;
-13-
(3) the time period during which the written protocol will be in effect, not to exceed two years; (4) the types of collaborative authority decisions that the pharmacists are authorized to make, including (A) types of diseases, drugs, or drug categories involved and the type of collaborative authority authorized in each case; and (B) procedures, decision criteria, or plans the pharmacists are to follow when making therapeutic decisions, particularly when modification or initiation of drug therapy is involved; (5) activities the pharmacists are to follow in the course of exercising collaborative authority, including documentation of decisions made, and a plan for communication and feedback to the authorizing practitioners concerning specific decisions made; (6) a list of the specific types of patients eligible to receive services under the written protocol; (7) a plan for the authorizing practitioners to review the decisions made by the pharmacists at least once every three months; and (8) a plan for providing the authorizing practitioners with each patient record created under the written protocol.
(c) To enter into a written protocol under this section, practitioners authorized to prescribe must be in active practice, and the authority granted must be within the scope of the practitioners' practice.
(d) Unless the board is satisfied that the pharmacist has been adequately trained in the procedures outlined in the written protocol, the board will specify and require completion of additional training that covers those procedures before issuing approval of the protocol.
(e) Documentation related to the written protocol must be maintained for at least two years.
(f) The written protocol may be terminated upon written notice by the authorizing practitioners or pharmacists.
The pharmacists shall notify the board in writing within 30 days after a written protocol is terminated.
(g) Any modification to the written protocol must be approved by the board as required by this section for a new written protocol.
ARTICLE 3.
LICENSE RENEWAL AND CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS.
Section 300.
310.
320.
325.
330.
340.
350.
License renewal Reinstatement of an expired pharmacist license Continuing education requirements for pharmacists Continuing education requirements for pharmacy technicians Alternative continuing education schedule Approved programs Audit of records by the board
12 AAC 52.300.
LICENSE RENEWAL.
(a) Pharmacy, wholesale drug distributor, and drug room licenses expire on June 30 of even-numbered years.
(b) An applicant for renewal of a pharmacy, wholesale drug distributor, or drug room license shall submit (1) a completed renewal application; (2) the license renewal fees required in 12 AAC 02.310; and (3) a completed self-inspection of the premises questionnaire on a form provided by the department.
(c) An applicant for renewal of a pharmacist or pharmacy technician license shall submit on or before the license expiration date (1) a completed renewal application; (2) the license renewal fees required in 12 AAC 02.310; and (3) documentation that the applicant has met all continuing education requirements of 12 AAC 52.320 ­ 12 AAC 52.350.
12 AAC 52.310.
REINSTATEMENT OF AN EXPIRED PHARMACIST OR PHARMACY TECHNICIAN LICENSE.
(a) If a pharmacist's or pharmacy technician's license has expired for any reason, that pharmacist or pharmacy technician may not practice pharmacy until the license is reinstated by the board.
(b) The board will reinstate a pharmacist or pharmacy technician license that has been expired less than two years if the applicant submits (1) a completed renewal application; (2) any applicable license renewal fees required in 12 AAC 02.310; (3) repealed 5/5/00; and (4) documentation that the applicant has met all continuing education requirements of 12 AAC 52.320 ­ 12 AAC 52.350.
(c) The board will reinstate a pharmacist license that has been expired at least two years but not more than five years if the applicant (1) submits a completed application for reinstatement on a form provided by the department;
-14-
(2) pays any applicable license renewal fees required in 12 AAC 02.310 for the entire period the license has been expired; (3) repealed 5/5/00; (4) submits evidence of completion of all continuing education requirements in 12 AAC 52.320 - 12 AAC 52.350 that would have been required to maintain a current license for the entire period the license has been expired; and (5) passes the Alaska pharmacy jurisprudence examination with a score of 75 percent or above.
(d) The board will reinstate a pharmacist license that has been expired for five years or more if the applicant (1) submits a completed application for reinstatement on a form provided by the department; (2) pays any applicable license renewal fees required in 12 AAC 02.310 for the entire period the license has been expired; (3) repealed 5/5/00; and (4) qualifies by (A) retaking and passing the examinations required in 12 AAC 52.090(a); or (B) providing verification that the applicant has been continually practicing pharmacy in another state under a license issued by the authority of that state for the period that the license has been expired, and by meeting the requirements of 12 AAC 52.
090(a)(2). (e) A pharmacy technician license that has been expired for two years or more will not be reinstated.
12 AAC 52.320.
CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PHARMACISTS.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this section, an applicant for renewal of a pharmacist license shall certify having completed 30 contact hours of continuing education accepted by the board under 12 AAC 52.340(a) during the concluding license period.
(b) This section does not prevent the board from imposing additional continuing education requirements under its disciplinary powers.
(c) An individual who is applying for renewal of a pharmacist license for the first time shall certify having completed one half of the continuing education requirements in (a) of this section for each complete 12 month period that the applicant was licensed during the concluding license period.
(d) An applicant for reinstatement of a pharmacist license that has expired shall certify that the applicant completed the continuing education requirements in (a) of this section before applying for reinstatement.
12 AAC 52.325.
CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR PHARMACY TECHNICIANS.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this section, an applicant for renewal of a pharmacy technician license shall certify having completed 10 contact hours of continuing education accepted by the board under 12 AAC 52.340 during the concluding licensing period.
(b) This section does not prevent the board from imposing additional continuing education requirements under its disciplinary powers.
(c) An individual who is applying for renewal of a pharmacy technician license for the first time must certify having completed the continuing education requirements in (a) of this section.
Alternatively, the individual (1) shall (A) verify in an affidavit, on an application for renewal, that the applicant has read the state statutes and regulations compiled by the board; and (B) submit an affidavit, signed by the pharmacist-in-charge, verifying technician training in accordance with 12 AAC 52.230; or (2) must have obtained certification as a pharmacy technician by the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board(PTCB). (d) An applicant for reinstatement of a pharmacy technician license that has expired shall certify that the applicant completed the continuing education requirements in (a) of this section before applying for reinstatement.
Editor's note: Information on the certification process described in 12 AAC 52.325(c)(2) may be obtained from the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board, 2215 Constitution Avenue NW, Washington, DC 20037-2985, phone: 202-429-7576.
The Alaska Pharmaceutical Association, P.O. Box 10-1185, Anchorage, AK 99510 also provides certification information.
12 AAC 52.330.
ALTERNATIVE CONTINUING EDUCATION SCHEDULE.
An individual licensed under AS 08.80 may apply to the board for an alternative schedule of continuing education if the individual's failure to meet the continuing education requirements in 12 AAC 52.320 is due to illness or other extenuating circumstances.
12 AAC 52.340 APPROVED PROGRAMS.(a) The following programs will be accepted by the board as continuing education for pharmacists and pharmacy technicians under 12 AAC 52.320 and 12 AAC 52.325: (1) any program presented by a provider approved by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education; (2) cardiopulmonary resuscitation(CPR) courses presented by the American Red Cross or the American Heart Association that lead to CPR certification; the board will accept no more than one contact hour of continuing education credit in a 24 month period for completion of a CPR course.
-15-
(b) The following programs will be accepted by the board as continuing education under 12 AAC 52.325, when the subject contributes directly to the professional competency of a pharmacy technician and is directly related to pharmacy principles and practice: (1) any program presented or approved by the Alaska Pharmaceutical Association; (2) any program presented or approved by the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board(PTCB). (c) An individual who presents an approved continuing education program may receive credit for the time spent during the actual presentation of the program.
An individual may not receive credit for the same presentation more than once during a licensing period.
12 AAC 52.350.
AUDIT OF RECORDS BY THE BOARD.
(a) The board will randomly audit renewal applications for verification of reported continuing education contact hours.
(b) Upon written request, a pharmacist or pharmacy technician shall provide the board with a copy of each certificate of completion for the continuing education units reported during the time period audited by the board.
(c) If the board disallows continuing education contact units reported by a pharmacist or pharmacy technician, the pharmacist or pharmacy technician shall (1) complete the number of disallowed contact hours in an approved program and report the completion to the board within 90 days of the date the board sends notification of the disallowed contact hours; and (2) provide the board with copies of certificates of completion for all continuing education units completed for the next two licensing periods.
(d) A pharmacist or pharmacy technician who submits to the board a false or fraudulent record relating to the pharmacist's or pharmacy technician's satisfaction of a continuing education requirement under 12 AAC 52.320 or 12 AAC 52.325 is subject to disciplinary action by the board.
(e) In this section a "certificate of completion" means a certificate or other document presented to a participant upon successful completion of a continuing education program that contains the following information: (1) name of the participant; (2) title and date of the program; (3) name of the approved provider; (4) number of contact hours or continuing education units awarded; (5) the assigned ACPE universal program number; (6) a dated, certifying signature of the approved provider; and (7) the official ACPE logo.
ARTICLE 4.
GUIDELINES FOR PHARMACIES AND PHARMACISTS.
Section 400.
410.
420.
430.
440.
General guidelines for pharmacies Care of drug stocks and devices Security Guidelines relating to sterile pharmaceuticals Guidelines relating to compounding practices required to be licensed guidelines on facilities, in the pamphlet titled, this section.
12 AAC 52.400.
GENERAL GUIDELINES FOR PHARMACIES.
A person that is by AS 08.80 and who has a license under AS 08.80 and this chapter shall adhere to the reference material, equipment, supplies, and other guidelines established by the board "Facility Standards for Pharmacies," dated February 1997, and incorporated by reference in
Editor's note: The pamphlet incorporated by reference in 12 AAC 52.400, "Facility Standards for Pharmacies" may be obtained from the Juneau office of the division of occupational licensing in the Department of Community and Economic Development.
12 AAC 52.410.
CARE expiration date shall be remo 52.560.
(b) A pharmacist may not (c) All drugs and devices and adulteration.
OF DRUG STOCKS AND DEVICES.
(a) A drug or device that has exceeded its ved from stock and quarantined until properly disposed of in accordance with 12 AAC dispense a drug or device beyond the expiration date on the drug or device.
on shelves or display for sale shall be protected against contamination, deterioration,
12 AAC 52.420.
SECURITY.
(a) Each pharmacist, while on duty, is responsible for the security of the pharmacy, including effective control against theft or diversion of drugs.
(b) The pharmacist-in-charge is responsible for compliance with all prescription department security requirements.
(c) All drugs, devices, and other items or products that are restricted to sale by or under the personal supervision of a pharmacist shall be kept in the prescription department.
-16-
(d) The prescription department shall be locked by key or combination to prevent access when a pharmacist is not on-site.
(e) A pharmacy with service hours differing from the remainder of the business establishment must have a telephone number that is separate from the remainder of the business establishment.
(f) Prescriptions shall be stored in the prescription department and may not be removed unless a pharmacist is present and the removal is for immediate delivery to the patient, the patient's agent, or the person delivering the prescription to the patient or the patient's agent.
(g) A pharmacist shall provide adequate security for prescription records to prevent unauthorized access to confidential health information.
(h) In this section, "prescription department" means the area of the pharmacy where prescription drugs are stored.
12 AAC 52.430.
GUIDELINES RELATING TO STERILE PHARMACEUTICALS.
A pharmacy or pharmacist that prepares or dispenses sterile pharmaceuticals shall adhere to the guidelines established by the board in the pamphlet titled, "Sterile Pharmaceuticals," dated February 1997, and incorporated by reference in this section.
Editor's note: The pamphlet incorporated by reference in 12 AAC 52.430, "Sterile Pharmaceuticals" may be obtained from the Juneau office of the division of occupational licensing in the Department of Community and Economic Development.
12 AAC 52.440.
GUIDELINES RELATING TO COMPOUNDING PRACTICES.
A pharmacy or pharmacist that compounds drugs shall adhere to the guidelines established by the board in the pamphlet titled, "Compounding Practices," dated February 1997, and incorporated by reference in this section Editor's note: The pamphlet incorporated by reference in 12 AAC 52.440, "Compounding Practices" may be obtained from the Juneau office of the Division of Occupational Licensing in the Department of Community and Economic Development.
ARTICLE 5.
PHARMACY PRACTICE STANDARDS.
Section 450.
460.
470.
480.
490.
500.
510.
520.
530.
540.
550.
560.
570.
580.
585.
590.
Prescription drug order records Prescription drug order information Refills Labeling Prescription drug orders transmitted by facsimile or digital electronic transmittal Transfer of a prescription drug order Substitution Customized patient medication package (patient med-pak) Return or exchange of drugs Notification of theft or significant loss Advertising Destruction and disposal of drugs Drug regimen review Data processing systems Mandatory patient counseling Prepackaging of drugs
12 AAC 52.450.
PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDER RECORDS.
(a) A pharmacy shall maintain prescription drug orders for a period of two years from the date of filling or the date of the last dispensed refill.
The prescription drug orders shall be maintained in numerical order and in a manner that ensures they will remain legible for the required two-year period.
(b) To comply with (a) of this section, a pharmacy shall maintain the prescription drug orders by keeping in its file (1) the original written prescription drug order; (2) a plain paper version of the prescription drug order received by facsimile or digital electronic transmittal; or (3) a prescription drug order put into writing either manually or electronically by the pharmacist.
12 AAC 52.460.
PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDER INFORMATION.
(a) Before a pharmacist may fill a prescription drug order, the pharmacist shall obtain the following information: (1) name of the patient or, if the prescription drug order is for an animal, species of the animal and name of the owner;
-17-
(2) address of the patient unless the prescription drug order is for a noncontrolled substance and the address is readily retrievable on another appropriate, uniformly maintained pharmacy record, such as a patient medication record; (3) name and, if the prescription drug order is for a controlled substance, the address and DEA registration number of the prescribing practitioner; (4) name and strength of the drug prescribed; (5) quantity prescribed; (6) directions for use; (7) date of issue; (8) refills authorized, if any; and (9) if a written prescription drug order, the prescribing practitioner's signature.
(b) At the time of dispensing, a pharmacist shall add the following information to the prescription drug order: (1) unique identification number of the prescription drug order; (2) initials or identification code of the dispensing pharmacist; (3) quantity dispensed, if different from the quantity prescribed; (4) date of dispensing, if different from the date of issue; (5) if the drug was prescribed by generic name or if an equivalent drug product other than the one prescribed was dispensed, for the drug product actually dispensed, at least one of the following: (A) the name of the manufacturer or distributor; (B) the national drug code number; (C) the short name code; or (D) the trade name.
12 AAC 52.470.
REFILLS.
(a) A pharmacist may dispense a refill of a prescription drug order only in accordance with the prescribing practitioner's authorization as indicated on the prescription drug order.
If there are no refill instructions on the prescription drug order, or if all refills authorized on the original prescription drug order have been dispensed, a pharmacist shall obtain authorization from the prescribing practitioner before dispensing a refill. (b) A pharmacist may not dispense a refill of a prescription drug order for a noncontrolled substance after one year from the date of issue of the original prescription drug order.
(c) Each time a prescription drug order is dispensed, the pharmacist shall record the refill electronically or on the back of the prescription drug order by listing the date of dispensing, the written initials or identification code of the dispensing pharmacist, and the amount dispensed if different from the quantity on the original prescription drug order.
12 AAC 52.480.
LABELING.
One or more labels containing the following information shall be affixed to every container in which a prescription drug order is dispensed: (1) name, address, and phone number of the pharmacy; (2) unique identification number of the prescription drug order; (3) date the prescription drug order is dispensed; (4) initials of the dispensing pharmacist; (5) name of the prescribing practitioner; (6) name of the patient or, if the drug was prescribed for an animal, the species of animal and the name of the owner; (7) directions for use; (8) quantity dispensed; (9) appropriate ancillary instructions or cautions; (10) if the prescription drug order is for a schedule II-V controlled substance, the statement, "Caution: Federal law prohibits the transfer of this drug to any person other than the patient for whom it was prescribed"; (11) the name and strength of the actual drug product dispensed, unless otherwise directed by the prescribing practitioner; and (12) the accepted generic drug name and strength of the drug dispensed; if the drug product dispensed has multiple ingredients, the pharmacist shall provide this information in writing to the patient or the patient's agent.
12 AAC 52.490.
PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDERS TRANSMITTED BY FACSIMILE OR DIGITAL ELECTRONIC TRANSMITTAL.
(a) A pharmacist may dispense a prescription drug order transmitted by facsimile or digital electronic transmittal only if the prescribing practitioner or the prescribing practitioner's agent places the following information on the face of the prescription drug order before it is transmitted: (1) name, address, and telephone number of the prescribing practitioner; (2) signature of the prescribing practitioner or the prescribing practitioner's agent; (3) the information required in 12 AAC 52.460(a)(1) - (8); and (4) any other information required by federal law.
(b) A pharmacist may dispense a prescription drug order that the pharmacist has received by facsimile or digital electronic transmittal only when the prescription drug order is transmitted directly to a pharmacy by a prescribing practitioner or the prescribing practitioner's agent.
-18-
12 AAC 52.500.
TRANSFER OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG ORDER.
(a) For the purpose of dispensing a refill of a prescription drug order, original prescription drug order information may be transferred between pharmacies if the requirements of 12 AAC 52.460 and this section are met.
(b) Original prescription drug order information for controlled substances listed in schedules III, IV, or V may be transferred only by the pharmacy that originally received the prescription drug order from the prescribing practitioner.
(c) Original prescription drug order information for noncontrolled substances may be transferred between pharmacies without limitation up to the number of originally authorized refills. (d) A pharmacy transferring a prescription drug order or receiving a transferred prescription drug order must meet the following requirements: (1) the transfer shall be communicated directly between two licensed pharmacists; (2) both the original and the transferred prescription drug order must meet the requirements of 12 AAC 52.450(a); (3) the pharmacist transferring the prescription drug order information shall (A) write "void" on the face of the transferred prescription drug order; and (B) record on the reverse side of the transferred prescription drug order the following information: (i) name, address, and if a controlled substance, the DEA registration number of the pharmacy receiving the prescription drug order information; (ii) name of the pharmacist receiving the prescription drug order information; (iii) name of the pharmacist transferring the prescription drug order information; and (iv) date of the transfer; (4) the pharmacist receiving the transferred prescription drug order information shall (A) write "transfer" on the face of the transferred prescription drug order; and (B) record on the transferred prescription drug order the following information: (i) original date of issue and date of dispensing, if different from the date of issue; (ii) original prescription drug order number and the number of refills authorized on the original prescription drug order; (iii) number of valid refills remaining and the date of the last refill; (iv) name, address, and if a controlled substance, the DEA registration number of the pharmacy transferring the prescription drug order information; and (v) name of the pharmacist transferring the prescription drug order information; and (5) when a prescription drug order is transferred, the transferring pharmacy may not issue any further refills. (e) A pharmacy using an automated data processing system shall meet the same requirements for a manual prescription drug order transfer listed in (d) of this section.
(f) If two or more pharmacies use a common electronic database for prescription record keeping, prescription drug orders may be refilled at any of the pharmacies using the common electronic database if provisions are made (1) for an audit trail that documents the location of each filling; and (2) to ensure that the number of authorized refills is not exceeded.
12 AAC 52.510.
SUBSTITUTION.
(a) A pharmacist may dispense an equivalent drug product instead of the prescribed drug if (1) the prescribing practitioner does not hand write on the prescription drug order that a specific brand must be dispensed, using language such as "brand medically necessary" or similar wording; (2) the patient is notified and consents to the substitution; (3) the equivalent drug product costs the patient less than the prescribed drug product; and (4) for the drug product actually dispensed, the pharmacist notes on the prescription drug order one of the following: (A) the drug product's manufacturer or distributor; (B) national drug code number; (C) short name code; or (D) trade name.
(b) The determination of the drug product to be dispensed for a prescription drug order is a professional responsibility of the pharmacist.
A pharmacist may not dispense any product that in the pharmacist's professional opinion is not an equivalent drug product as the term "equivalent drug product" is defined in AS 08.80.480.
12 AAC 52.520.
CUSTOMIZED PATIENT MEDICATION PACKAGE (PATIENT MED-PAK). (a) Instead of dispensing one or more prescribed drug products in separate containers, a pharmacist may, with the written consent of the patient, patient's caregiver, or prescribing practitioner, provide a customized patient medication package or patient med-pak. (b) A patient med-pak is a series of containers prepared by a pharmacist for a specific patient containing one or more prescribed solid oral dosage forms and designed or labeled to indicate the day and time, or period of time, when the contents within each container are to be taken.
(c) The pharmacist shall prepare a label for a patient med-pak that includes (1) the name of the patient;
-19-
(2) the unique identification number for the patient med-pak itself and a separate unique identification number for each of the prescription drug orders for the drug products in the patient med-pak; (3) the name, strength, physical description or identification, and total quantity of each drug product in the patient med-pak; (4) the directions for use and cautionary statements, if any, contained in the prescription drug order for each drug product in the patient med-pak; (5) any other information, statements, or warnings required or appropriate for any of the drug products in the patient med-pak; (6) the name of the prescribing practitioner of each drug product in the patient med-pak; (7) the date of preparation of the patient med-pak and the expiration date assigned to the patient med-pak; the expiration date may not be more than 60 days from the date of preparation of the patient med-pak; (8) the name, address, and telephone number of the pharmacy; and (9) the initials of the dispensing pharmacist.
(d) If the patient med-pak allows for the removal or separation of the intact containers from the patient med-pak, the pharmacist shall label each individual container of the patient med-pak to identify each of the drug products contained in the patient med-pak. (e) When preparing a patient med-pak, the dispensing pharmacist shall take into account any applicable compendium requirements or guidelines and the physical and chemical compatibility of the dosage forms placed within each container in the med-pak and any therapeutic incompatibilities that may attend the simultaneous administration of the drugs.
(f) In addition to any individual prescription filing requirements, the pharmacist shall make and file a record of each patient med-pak.
Each record must contain (1) the name and address of the patient; (2) a unique identification number for the patient med-pak itself and a separate, unique, identification number for each of the prescription drug orders for each drug product contained in the patient med-pak; (3) information identifying or describing the design, characteristics, or specifications of the patient med-pak that is sufficient to prepare an identical patient med-pak for the patient; (4) the date of preparation of the patient med-pak and the expiration date assigned; (5) any special labeling instructions; and (6) the name or initials of the pharmacist who prepared the patient med-pak. 12 AAC 52.530.
RETURN OR EXCHANGE OF DRUGS.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, a pharmacy or pharmacist may not accept a drug for return or exchange after the drug has been taken from the premises where the drug was sold, distributed, or dispensed.
(b) A pharmacy serving an institutional facility may accept for return or reuse unit dose packages or full or partial multiple dose medication cards if (1) the pharmacist can readily determine that there has been no entry or attempt at entry to the unit dose package or blister card; (2) in the pharmacist's professional judgment, the unit dose package or multiple dose medication card meets the standards of the United States Pharmacopoeia (1995 revision) for storage conditions, including temperature, light sensitivity, and chemical and physical stability; (3) the drug has not come into the physical possession of the person for whom it was prescribed, and control of the drug is known to the pharmacist to have been the responsibility of a person or persons licensed to prescribe, dispense, or administer drugs; and (4) the drug labeling or packaging has not been altered or defaced, and the identity of the drug, its strength, lot number, and expiration date are retrievable.
Editor's note: A copy of the United States Pharmacopoeia may be obtained from the United States Pharmacopoeial Convention, Inc., P. O. Box 560, Williston, VT 05495.
12 AAC 52.540.
NOTIFICATION OF THEFT OR SIGNIFICANT LOSS.
If a pharmacy is required under 21 U.S.C. 801 - 904 (Controlled Substances Act) to complete DEA Form 106, "Report of Theft or Loss of Controlled Substances," the pharmacist-in-charge shall also send a copy of the completed form to the board.
12 AAC 52.550.
ADVERTISING.
A pharmacy may advertise prescription drug prices if the advertisement contains all of the following information: (1) proprietary, trade, or generic name of the drug product; (2) name of the manufacturer or distributor of the drug product; (3) dosage form and strength of the drug product; (4) price charged for a specific quantity of the drug product; and (5) the hours that pharmaceutical services are available from the advertiser.
12 AAC 52.560.
DESTRUCTION AND DISPOSAL OF DRUGS.
(a) A licensed pharmacist may destroy noncontrolled prescription drugs if the drugs are destroyed in a manner that makes the drugs unfit for human consumption.
-20-
(b) A drug that is a controlled substance shall be disposed of in accordance with federal statutes and regulations.
12 AAC 52.570.
DRUG REGIMEN REVIEW.
(a) A pharmacist shall perform a drug regimen review, as defined in AS 08.80.480, for each prescription drug order.
(b) If a pharmacist identifies any of the items listed in AS 08.80.480 during the drug regimen review, the pharmacist shall avoid or resolve the problem by consulting with the prescribing practitioner, if necessary.
12 AAC 52.580.
DATA PROCESSING SYSTEMS.
A pharmacy may use an automated data processing system to maintain the records required in AS 08.80 and this chapter if the system (1) is capable of on-line retrieval of all information required in 12 AAC 52.460, 12 AAC 52.470, and 21 C.F.R. 1306.22, as amended as of February 6, 1997; (2) is capable of producing an audit trail printout for all dispensing of any specified strength and dosage form of a drug; and (3) has adequate safeguards to prevent loss of data and reasonable security to prevent unauthorized access to, modification of, or manipulation of patient records.
12 AAC 52.585.
MANDATORY PATIENT COUNSELING.
(a) With each new prescription dispensed, the pharmacist shall make an offer to provide counseling to the patient or the patient's caregiver on matters considered significant in the pharmacist's professional judgment.
The offer shall be made verbally by the pharmacist or the pharmacist's agent.
The counseling may include (1) the name and description of the prescribed drug; (2) the dosage and the dosage form; (3) the method and route of administration; (4) the duration of the prescribed drug therapy; (5) any special directions and precautions for preparation, administration, and use by the patient that the pharmacist determines are necessary; (6) common severe side or adverse effects or interactions and therapeutic contraindications that may be encountered, how to avoid them, and what actions should be taken if they occur; (7) patient techniques for self-monitoring of the drug therapy; (8) proper storage; (9) prescription refill information; and (10) the action to be taken in the event of a missed dose.
(b) If a patient or patient's caregiver accepts the offer to provide counseling, a pharmacist shall counsel the patient or the patient's caregiver face-to-face.
If face-to-face counseling is not possible, a pharmacist shall make a reasonable effort to provide the counseling by use of a telephone, two-way radio, or in writing.
In place of a pharmacist's own written information regarding a prescribed drug, the pharmacist may use abstracts of the Patient United States Pharmacopoeia Drug Information or comparable information.
(c) This section does not apply to a pharmacist who dispenses drugs for inpatient use in a hospital or other institution if the drug is to be administered by a nurse or other appropriate health care provider.
(d) This section does not require a pharmacist to provide patient counseling when a patient or the patient's caregiver refuses the counseling.
12 AAC 52.590.
PREPACKAGING OF DRUGS.
For the purpose of supplying drugs to a prescribing practitioner, drugs shall be prepackaged in child-resistant containers under the direct supervision of a pharmacist and bear a label that contains (1) the name, address, and telephone number of the pharmacy; (2) the name, strength, and quantity of the drug; (3) the lot number and expiration date of the drug, if not already contained on the unit-of-use or drug packaging; (4) cautionary information required for patient safety and information; and (5) the initials of the pharmacist.
ARTICLE 6.
WHOLESALE DRUG DISTRIBUTORS AND FACILITIES.
Section 610.
620.
625.
630.
640.
645.
650.
660.
Wholesale drug distributor license application Wholesale drug facilities Personnel requirements; grounds for denial or other disciplinary action Drug storage Written policies and procedures Examination of drug shipments Records and inventories Returned, damaged, and outdated drugs
-21-
670.
680.
685.
690.
695.
Drug recalls Inspections Prohibition against direct distribution Salvage and reprocessing Provisions not applicable
12 AAC 52.610.
WHOLESALE DRUG DISTRIBUTOR LICENSE APPLICATION.
(a) An applicant for a wholesale drug distributor license shall (1) apply on the form provided by the department; (2) pay the fees required in 12 AAC 02.310; (3) provide a list of the names and résumés of officers, directors, or primary stockholders responsible for the wholesale drug facility; (4) provide the name and the résumé of the person who will manage the wholesale distribution of drugs and the wholesale drug facility; (5) submit a completed self-inspection of the premises questionnaire on a form provided by the department; and (6) submit completed fingerprint cards of the facility manager for evaluation and investigation by the Department of Public Safety.
(b) An applicant for a wholesale drug distributor license that will be distributing controlled substances shall (1) meet the requirements of (a) of this section; and (2) be registered with the DEA 12 AAC 52.620.
WHOLESALE DRUG FACILITIES.
(a) A wholesale drug facility in which drugs are stored, repacked, or sold to persons, businesses, or government agencies that may legally purchase drugs must (1) have storage areas that ensure proper lighting, ventilation, temperature, sanitation, humidity, space, equipment, and security conditions; (2) be of suitable size, construction, and location to facilitate cleaning, maintenance, and proper operations; (3) be equipped with an alarm system to detect entry into the wholesale drug facility after business hours; (4) meet all applicable federal, state, and local building standards; (5) be secure from unauthorized entry from outside the facility, including having exterior lighting along the outside perimeter of the facility; (6) restrict entry into areas inside the facility where drugs are stored; entry must be open to authorized personnel only; (7) have a quarantine area for storage of drugs that are outdated, damaged, deteriorated, misbranded, or adulterated, or that are in a secondary container that has been opened or the seal of which has been broken; (8) be maintained in a clean and orderly condition; and (9) be free from infestation by insects, rodents, birds, or vermin of any kind.
(b) A wholesale drug facility must develop internal security policies, including protection of computer records, to provide reasonable protection against theft or diversion of drugs by personnel.
(c) A wholesale drug facility may not be located in a residence.
12 AAC 52.625.
PERSONNEL REQUIREMENTS; GROUNDS FOR DENIAL OR OTHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION.
(a) A wholesale drug distributor shall maintain a roster of all officers, directors, and managers responsible for wholesale drug distribution, storage, and handling.
The roster shall include a description of each person's duties and a summary of the person's experience.
(b) The board will not approve an application for a wholesale drug distributor license unless the designated manager in charge of the drug facility documents having a basic knowledge of federal and state laws related to the wholesale distribution of drugs.
12 AAC 52.630.
DRUG STORAGE.
(a) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that all drugs are stored at appropriate temperatures in accordance with label requirements or official United States Pharmacopoeia (USP), 1995 revision, compendium requirements, to help ensure that the identity, strength, quality, and purity of the products are not affected.
If a temperature requirement is not listed for a drug, the drug may be stored at controlled room temperature as defined in the USP. (b) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that a separate quarantine storage area is provided for drugs that are deteriorated, outdated, damaged, misbranded, adulterated, or are in a secondary container that has been opened or the seal of which has been broken.
(c) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that appropriate manual, electromechanical, or electronic temperature and humidity recording equipment or handwritten logs are used to document how drugs have been stored.
Editor's notes: A copy of the United States Pharmacopoeia may be obtained from the United States Pharmacopoeial Convention, Inc., P. O. Box 560, Williston, VT 05495.
-22-
12 AAC 52.640.
WRITTEN POLICIES AND PROCEDURES.
A wholesale drug distributor shall prepare and follow a written procedure to (1) handle crisis situations that affect the security or operation of the wholesale drugs facility, including fire, flood, earthquake or other natural disasters, and situations of local, state, or national emergency; (2) identify, record, report to the board, and correct any error found in an inventory; (3) ensure that any outdated drug or any drug with an expiration date that, in the wholesale drug distributor's view, does not allow sufficient time for repacking or resale, is segregated from other stock, is documented as a drug that has a characteristic described in this paragraph and is prepared for timely return to the manufacturer or is destroyed; (4) ensure that the wholesale drug distributor exercises control over the shipping and receiving of all drugs within the wholesale drug distribution operation; (5) ensure the proper handling and disposal of returned drugs; (6) ensure that the oldest approved stock of a drug is distributed first and that any deviation from this requirement is only temporary; (7) ensure the proper handling of a drug recall and a replacement of a drug in accordance with 12 AAC 52.670.
12 AAC 52.645.
EXAMINATION OF DRUG SHIPMENTS.
(a) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that upon receipt of a drug shipment, each outside shipping container is visually examined for identity and damage in order to reduce the acceptance of drugs that are contaminated or unfit for distribution.
(b) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that each outgoing shipment of drugs is inspected for identity of the contents and the integrity of the shipping container in order to ensure that the drugs to be shipped were not damaged in storage, held under improper conditions, or likely to receive damage in shipment.
12 AAC 52.650.
RECORDS AND INVENTORIES.
(a) A wholesale drug distributor shall establish and maintain records and inventories of all transactions regarding the receipt, distribution, or disposition of a drug.
The records must include the following information: (1) the source of the drug, including the name and principal address of the seller or transferor and the address of the location from which the drug was shipped; (2) the identity and quantity of the drug received, distributed, or disposed of; and (3) the date of receipt and of distribution or other disposition.
(b) The records and inventories required by this section must be made available at a central location for inspection within two working days after a request by an authorized inspector.
The records and inventories required by this section must be kept for a period of two years after disposition of the drug.
12 AAC 52.660.
RETURNED, DAMAGED, AND OUTDATED DRUGS.
(a) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that a drug that is outdated, damaged, deteriorated, misbranded, or adulterated is quarantined and physically separated from other drugs until it is either destroyed or returned to the supplier.
(b) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that a drug that has a secondary container that has been opened or used is identified as such, and is quarantined and physically separated from other drugs until the drug is either destroyed or returned to the supplier.
(c) A wholesale drug distributor shall ensure that if the conditions under which a drug has been returned, shipped, or stored cast doubt on the drug's safety, identity, strength, quality, or purity, the drug is destroyed or returned to the supplier, unless examination, testing, or other investigation proves that the drug meets appropriate standards of safety, identity, strength, quality, and purity.
12 AAC 52.670.
DRUG RECALLS.
A wholesale drug distributor shall prepare and follow a written policy for handling the recall of a drug due to (1) a voluntary action on the part of the manufacturer; (2) an order of the Food and Drug Administration, or of any other federal, state, or local government agency; or (3) the replacement of an existing drug with an improved drug or new package design.
12 AAC 52.680.
INSPECTIONS.
A wholesale drug distributor shall permit an authorized inspector or law enforcement official, who shows proper identification, to enter and inspect that distributor's facilities and delivery vehicles at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, and to inspect that distributor's records and written operating procedures.
12 AAC 52.685.
PROHIBITIONS AGAINST DIRECT DISTRIBUTION.
A wholesale drug distributor may not distribute a drug or preparation directly to a consumer or patient.
12 AAC 52.690.
SALVAGE AND REPROCESSING.
A wholesale drug distributor is subject to the provisions of all applicable federal and state statutes and regulations and local ordinances that relate to drug salvaging or reprocessing, including 21 C.F.R.
Parts 207, 210, and 211, as amended as of February 6, 1997.
-23-
12 AAC 52.695.
PROVISIONS NOT APPLICATIONS.
The following activities do not constitute wholesale distribution of prescription drugs for which a wholesale drug distributor license is required by 12 AAC 52.610 ­ 12 AAC 52.690: (1) intracompany sales, defined as any transaction or transfer between any division, subsidiary, parent, and an affiliated or related company under the common ownership and control of a corporate entity; (2) the purchase or acquisition, by a hospital or other health care entity that is a member of a group purchasing organization, of a drug, for its own use, from the group purchasing organization or from another hospital or health care entity that is a member of the group purchasing organization; (3) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by a charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954), as amended as of February 6, 1997, to a nonprofit affiliate of the organization to the extent otherwise permitted by the law; (4) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug among hospitals or other health care entities that are under common control; for purposes of this paragraph, "common control" means the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person or an organization, whether by ownership of stock, by voting rights, by contract, or otherwise; (5) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug for emergency medical reasons; for purposes of this paragraph, "emergency medical reasons" includes a transfer of prescription drugs by a retail pharmacy to another retail pharmacy to alleviate a temporary shortage, if the gross dollar value of the transfer does not exceed five percent of the total prescription drug sales revenue of either the transferor or transferee pharmacy during any 12-consecutive-month period; (6) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug, under a prescription; (7) the distribution of drug samples by manufacturers' representatives or distributors' representatives; or (8) the sale, purchase, or trade of blood and blood components intended for transfusion.
ARTICLE 7.
INSTITUTIONAL PHARMACIES.
Section 700.
710.
720.
730.
Institutional pharmacies Absence of a pharmacist from an institutional pharmacy Emergency room outpatient medications Drug distribution and control
12 AAC 52.700.
INSTITUTIONAL PHARMACIES.
Repealed 2/26/2000.
12 AAC 52.710.
ABSENCE OF A PHARMACIST FROM AN INSTITUTIONAL PHARMACY.
(a) When an institutional pharmacy will be unattended by a pharmacist, the pharmacist-in-charge shall arrange in advance for providing drugs for use within the institutional facility.
(b) When an institutional pharmacy is closed and a drug is required to treat a patient's immediate need and is not available from the drug stock outside of the pharmacy, a person designated by the pharmacist-in-charge and licensed to handle drugs may obtain the drug from the institutional pharmacy.
The pharmacist-in-charge is responsible (1) to record on a suitable form the removal of any drug from the institutional pharmacy by the person designated; the record must show the (A) patient's name and room number; (B) name, strength, and amount of the drug; (C) date and time of removal; and (D) initials or signature of the person designated who removed the drug from the pharmacy; (2) when the pharmacy reopens or as soon as is practical to check the stock container or similar unit dose package of the drug removed ; and (3) to ensure that the quantity of drugs that were removed is only the quantity necessary to sustain the patient until the pharmacy reopens.
12 AAC 52.720.
EMERGENCY ROOM OUTPATIENT MEDICATIONS.
(a) The pharmacist-in-charge of an institutional pharmacy, in cooperation with the appropriate committee of the institutional facility's medical staff, shall prepare a list of prescription drugs that may be delivered to outpatients receiving emergency treatment and shall determine appropriate quantities for unit-of-use packaging and prepackaging of the prescription drug.
(b) A licensed health care provider on emergency room staff may deliver the medications identified on the list of prescription drugs prepared under (a) of this section to a patient receiving emergency outpatient treatment if (1) the drug is ordered by an authorized prescribing practitioner either in writing or verbally; a verbal order must be transcribed into writing on the patient's record; (2) the medication is prepackaged in a child-resistant container under the direct supervision of a pharmacist; (3) the medication bears a label that contains the (A) name, address, and telephone number of the institutional facility;
-24-
(E) initials of the pharmacist; (4) no more than one prepackaged container of a drug is delivered to a patient unless more than one package is required to sustain the patient until a retail pharmacist is on duty in the community; however, the amount of the controlled substance delivered may not exceed a 72 hour supply; and (5) labeling of the container is completed by the licensed health care provider before the container is presented to the patient; the container label must include the (A) name of the patient; (B) directions for use by the patient; (C) date of delivery; (D) identifying number unique to the patient; (E) name of the prescribing practitioner; and (F) initials of the licensed health care provider delivering the prepackaged medication.
(c) Prepackaged medications shall be kept in a secure place within the emergency room.
(d) Following delivery of the prepackaged medication to the patient, the licensed health care provider shall document the quantity issued and initial the patient record containing the prescribing practitioner's order.
(e) This section does not apply to the administration of a single dose to a patient.
(f) In this section, "licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, or mobile intensive care paramedic licensed under AS 08.64; a dentist licensed under AS 08.36; or a nurse licensed under AS 08.68.
12 AAC 52.730.
DRUG DISTRIBUTION AND CONTROL.
(a) The pharmacist-in-charge of an institutional pharmacy is responsible for the storage, preparation, distribution, and control of the institutional facility's drug supply and for ensuring that these activities are carried out in conformance with established policies, procedures, and accepted standards.
(b) The pharmacist-in-charge of an institutional pharmacy shall establish written procedures for the distribution and control of drugs and for the provision of pharmacy service.
The procedures must be consistent with 12 AAC 52.710 and 12 AAC 52.720.
The pharmacist-in-charge shall make an annual updated copy of the policies and procedures available for inspection by the board.
(c) Persons employed at an institutional pharmacy who are licensed under AS 08.80 and this chapter shall provide drug information to the staff and practitioners of the institutional facility.
(d) Persons employed at an institutional pharmacy who are licensed under AS 08.80 and this chapter may assist in the planning of and participate in the institutional facility's education and staff development programs relating to drugs.
ARTICLE 8.
DRUG ROOMS AND FACILITIES WITHOUT A PHARMACY.
Section 800.
810.
820.
830.
840.
850.
Drug room license Pharmacist required Responsibilities of the consultant pharmacist Emergency drug kits First dose kits Emergency distribution
and
(B) name, strength, and quantity of the drug; (C) cautionary information required for patient safety and information; (D) lot number and expiration date if not already contained on the unit-of-use packaging or prepackaging;
12 AAC 52.800.
DRUG ROOM LICENSE.
(a) An institutional facility that does not maintain a pharmacy but prepares and administers prescription drugs from bulk supplies for patients receiving treatment within the facility must be licensed by the board as a drug room.
(b) An institutional facility that does not maintain a pharmacy but stores and administers prescription drugs that are labeled and dispensed for specific patients by a pharmacy does not require a drug room or pharmacy license.
12 AAC 52.810.
PHARMACIST REQUIRED.
An institutional facility described in 12 AAC 52.800(a) must continuously employ a pharmacist or have a written agreement with a pharmacy or pharmacist to provide consultant pharmacist services.
12 AAC 52.820.
RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE CONSULTANT PHARMACIST.
A pharmacist who, under 12 AAC 52.810, provides consultant pharmacy services shall (1) provide evaluations and recommendations concerning drug distribution, control, and use; (2) complete on-site reviews to ensure that drug handling and use procedures conform to AS 08.80, this chapter, and recognized standards of practice; (3) provide drug information to facility staff and physicians;
-25-
(5) assist in establishing policies and procedures to control the distribution and administration of drugs; and (6) document pharmacy services that are provided and maintain the documentation for a period of at least two years.
12 AAC 52.830.
EMERGENCY DRUG KITS. (a) An institutional facility described in 12 AAC 52.800(b) may have a limited supply of drugs provided by a pharmacist licensed under this chapter and AS 08.80 in emergency drug kits on-site.
An emergency drug kit is for use by personnel authorized to administer the drugs to patients receiving treatment within the institutional facility.
(b) The pharmacist who provides or supplies drugs in emergency drug kits shall cooperate with the prescribing practitioners on staff at the institutional facility to determine the identity and quantity of the drugs to be included in the emergency drug kits. (c) An emergency drug kit must (1) only contain drugs that are not available from any other source in sufficient time to prevent risk of harm to patients; (2) only contain drugs that are provided and sealed by a pharmacist; (3) be stored in a secured area to prevent unauthorized access; (4) be labeled on the exterior to indicate it is for use only in emergencies as described in this section; and (5) have a list of the kit's contents posted on or near the kit. (d) Drugs may be removed from an emergency drug kit only under a valid order from a prescribing practitioner.
(e) When the supplying pharmacist is notified that an emergency drug kit has been opened, the supplying pharmacist shall restock the kit within a reasonable time, not to exceed seven days.
(f) The supplying pharmacist shall label the exterior of an emergency drug kit to indicate the expiration date of the kit's contents.
The expiration date of an emergency drug kit is the earliest expiration date of any drug supplied in the kit.
When an emergency drug kit expires, the supplying pharmacist shall replace any expired drugs in the kit.
12 AAC 52.840.
FIRST DOSE KITS. (a) In addition to the emergency drug kit described in 12 AAC 52.830, an institutional facility described in 12 AAC 52.800 may maintain a first dose kit for the initiation of nonemergency drug therapy to a patient receiving treatment within the institutional facility if the necessary drug is not available from a pharmacy in time to prevent risk of harm to a patient.
(b) The dispensing or consultant pharmacy for the institutional facility and the medical staff of the institutional facility are responsible for the proper storage, security, and accountability of the first dose kit. (c) The staff of the dispensing or consultant pharmacy for the institutional facility shall determine jointly with the medical staff of the institutional facility the content and quantity of drugs to be included in the first dose kit.
12 AAC 52.850.
EMERGENCY DISTRIBUTION.
In an emergency, if a drug is not otherwise available, a drug room may distribute the drug from bulk supplies to a practitioner or a pharmacist for use by a patient outside the facility, under a prescription, until the drug can be otherwise obtained.
ARTICLE 9.
DISCIPLINARY GUIDELINES.
Section 900.
910.
920.
930.
940.
950.
960.
970.
980.
Purpose of disciplinary guidelines Violations Disciplinary guidelines Terms of probation Use of alcohol or controlled substances Probation terms for professional incompetence Mental or physical disabilities Reinstatement of a suspended license Reinstatement of a revoked license
use;
(4) plan and participate in the facility's staff development program relating to drug distribution, control, and
12 AAC 52.900.
PURPOSE OF DISCIPLINARY GUIDELINES.
The disciplinary guidelines in 12 AAC 52.900 - 12 AAC 52.980 are established to ensure the board's disciplinary policies are known and are administered consistently and fairly.
12 AAC 52.910.
VIOLATIONS.
(a) A person who is licensed under AS 08.80 and this chapter who, after a hearing under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), is found to have violated a provision of AS 08.80 or this chapter is subject to the disciplinary penalties listed in AS 08.01.075, including public notice of the violation and penalty in appropriate publications.
(b) Nothing in the guidelines set out in 12 AAC 52.920 prohibits the board from imposing greater or lesser penalties than those described in 12 AAC 52.920 or restricting the practice of a licensee depending upon the circumstances of a particular case.
-26-
12 AAC 52.920.
DISCIPLINARY GUIDELINES.
(a) In addition to acts specified in AS 08.80 or elsewhere in this chapter, each of the following constitutes engaging in unprofessional conduct and is a basis for the imposition of disciplinary sanctions under AS 08.01.075: (1) knowingly dispensing a drug under a forged, altered, or fraudulent prescription drug order; (2) dispensing drugs to an individual or individuals in quantities, dosages, or for periods of time that grossly exceed standards of practice, approved labeling of the federal Food and Drug Administration, or the guidelines published in professional literature; this paragraph does not apply to prescriptions dispensed to persons with intractable pain or to a narcotic drug dependent person in accordance with the requirements of 21 C.F.R. 1306.07, as amended as of February 6, 1997; (3) delivering or offering to deliver a prescription drug in violation of AS 08.80 or this chapter; (4) acquiring, possessing, or attempting to possess prescription drugs in violation of AS 08.80, AS 11.71, or this chapter; (5) distributing prescription drugs to a practitioner or a pharmacy not in the course of professional practice or in violation of AS 08.80 or this chapter; (6) refusing or failing to keep, maintain, or furnish any record, notification, or information required in AS 08.80 or this chapter; (7) refusing entry into a pharmacy for an inspection authorized by AS 08.80 or this chapter; (8) making a false or fraudulent claim to a third party for reimbursement for pharmacy services; (9) operating a pharmacy in an unsanitary manner; (10) making a false or fraudulent claim concerning a drug; (11) refilling a prescription drug order for a period of time in excess of one year from the date of issue of that prescription drug order; (12) violating the provisions of a board order or memorandum of agreement; (13) failing to provide information or providing false or fraudulent information on an application, notification, or other document required in AS 08.80 or this chapter; (14) for the following licensees, failing to establish or maintain effective controls against the diversion or loss of prescription drugs or prescription drug records, or failing to ensure that prescription drugs are dispensed in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations: (A) a pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy; (B) a sole proprietor or individual owner of a pharmacy; (C) a partner in the ownership of a pharmacy; or (D) a managing officer of a corporation, association, or joint-stock company owning a pharmacy; (15) failing to use reasonable knowledge, skills, or judgment in the practice of pharmacy; (16) knowingly delegating a function, task, or responsibility that is part of the practice of pharmacy to a person who is not licensed to perform that function, task, or responsibility when the delegation is contrary to AS 08.80 or this chapter or the delegation involves a substantial harm or risk to a patient; (17) failing to exercise adequate supervision over a person who is authorized to practice only under the supervision of a pharmacist; (18) violating AS 08.80.315 dealing with the confidentiality of records; (19) discriminating on the basis of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, or sex in the provision of a service that is part of the practice of pharmacy; (20) offering, giving, soliciting, or receiving compensation for referral of a patient; or (21) violating AS 08.80.261(a)(3). (b) The board will, in its discretion, revoke a license if the licensee (1) commits a violation that is a second offense; (2) violates the terms of probation from a previous offense; (3) violates AS 08.80.261(a)(1) or (4); (4) intentionally or negligently engages in conduct that results in a significant risk to the health or safety of a patient or injury to a patient; (5) is professionally incompetent if the incompetence results in risk of injury to a patient.
(c) The board will, in its discretion, suspend a license for up to two years followed by probation of not less than two years if the licensee (1) wilfully or repeatedly violates AS 08.80 or this chapter; or (2) is professionally incompetent if the incompetence results in the public health, safety, or welfare being placed at risk.
(d) The board will review, on an individual basis, the need for revocation or limitation of a license of a licensee who practices or attempts to practice while afflicted with a physical or mental illness, deterioration, or disability that interferes with the individual's practice of pharmacy.
12 AAC 52.930.
TERMS OF PROBATION.
The board will, in its, discretion, subject a licensee who is placed on probation to one or more of the following terms of probation, and to other relevant terms of probation, including those in 12 AAC 52.940 - 12 AAC 52.960: (1) obey all laws pertaining to the practice of pharmacy in this state;
-27-
(2) fully comply with the probation program established by the board and cooperate with representatives of the board; (3) notify the board in writing of the dates of departure and return if the licensee leaves the state to reside or practice pharmacy outside the state; (4) report in person at meetings of the board or to its designated representatives during the period of probation, as directed by the board; (5) submit written reports and verification of actions as required by the board during the period of probation; (6) if employed in the practice of pharmacy at any time during the period of probation, have the employer submit to the board verification that the employer understands the conditions of probation; (7) be employed as a pharmacist only in a setting in which full supervision is provided and not personally act as a supervisor.
12 AAC 52.940.
USE OF ALCOHOL OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES.
(a) In addition to one or more of the terms of probation set out in 12 AAC 52.930, a licensee placed on probation for the habitual abuse of alcohol or illegal use of controlled substances may also be subject to one or more of the following: (1) physical and mental health examinations as determined by the board to evaluate the licensee's ability to perform the professional duties of a pharmacist; (2) as determined by the board, participation until completion in an ongoing program of rehabilitative counseling, Alcoholics Anonymous, Narcotics Anonymous, or an impaired practitioner group that includes progress reports from the care provider when requested by the board; (3) abstaining from the personal use of alcohol or controlled substances in any form except when lawfully prescribed by a practitioner licensed to practice in Alaska; (4) submitting to tests and samples required for the detection of alcohol or controlled substances at the request of the board or the board's representative.
(b) Access to a controlled substance in the work setting will, in the board's discretion, be restricted.
12 AAC 52.950.
PROBATION TERMS FOR PROFESSIONAL INCOMPETENCE.
In addition to one or more of the terms of probation set out in 12 AAC 52.930, a licensee placed on probation after being found professionally incompetent may be subject to one or more of the following terms of probation: (1) successful completion of an appropriate course or courses in pharmacy, as determined by the board, before the end of the probationary period; or (2) participation in 15 contact hours of appropriate continuing education in pharmacy.
12 AAC 52.960.
MENTAL OR PHYSICAL DISABILITIES.
In addition to one or more of the terms of probation set out in 12 AAC 52.930, a licensee placed on probation for practicing or attempting to practice pharmacy while afflicted with a physical or mental illness, deterioration, or disability that interferes with the licensee's performance of pharmacy may be subject to a physical or mental health examination to evaluate the licensee's ability to perform the professional duties of a pharmacist and if medically determined to be necessary may be required to participate in and complete a recommended treatment program that includes written progress reports from the care provider when requested by the board.
12 AAC 52.970.
REINSTATEMENT OF A SUSPENDED LICENSE.
The board may reinstate a suspended license only if the requirements of the suspension order have been met.
12 AAC 52.980.
REINSTATEMENT OF A REVOKED LICENSE.
(a) One year after revocation of a license, a licensee may apply to the board in writing for reinstatement of the license.
(b) The applicant for reinstatement shall appear before the board.
(c) The board will, in its discretion, impose restrictions upon the pharmacist or pharmacy when reinstating a license.
ARTICLE 10.
GENERAL PROVISIONS.
Section 990.
Display of license certificate 995.
Definitions 12 AAC 52.990.
DISPLAY OF LICENSE CERTIFICATE.
A licensee shall conspicuously display the licensee's current license certificate in the practice site.
The current license certificate of a licensee practicing in an institutional facility may be displayed in a central location.
12 AAC 52.995.
DEFINITIONS.
(a) In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, (1) ACPE" means American Council on Pharmaceutical Education; (2) "approved program" means a continuing education activity that is a live program, home study, or other mediated instruction delivered by an approved provider;
-28-
(3) "approved provider" means an individual, institution, organization, association, corporation, or agency that is recognized by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education as able to provide quality continuing education programs; (4) "authorized inspector" means a member of the board or an investigator with the division of occupational licensing in the department; (5) "blood" means whole blood collected from a single donor and processed either for transfusion or further manufacturing; (6) "blood component" means that part of blood separated by physical or mechanical means; (7) "board" means the Alaska Board of Pharmacy; (8) "care provider" means a person or organization that by the nature of experience and training is qualified, in the opinion of the board, to provide substance abuse counseling, rehabilitation, or related services to the public through established and recognized treatment programs; (9) "consultant pharmacist" means a licensed pharmacist retained by written agreement with an institutional facility to consult on a routine basis with an institutional facility about the practice of pharmacy as it relates to that facility; (10) "contact hour" means a unit of measure of educational credit that is equivalent to approximately 50 minutes of participation in an organized learning experience; a continuing education unit or "CEU" is equivalent to ten contact hours; (11) "DEA" means the United States Drug Enforcement Agency; (12) "department" means the Department of Community and Economic Development; (13) "direct supervision" means visual or physical proximity that insures adequate safety controls; (14) "home study" and "other mediated instruction" mean continuing education activities that are not conducted as live programs, including audio tapes, video tapes, television, computer assisted instruction, journal articles, or monographs; (15) "institutional facility" means a (A) hospital; (B) long-term care facility, including a nursing home, convalescent home, or other related facility; (C) mental health facility; (D) rehabilitation center; (E) psychiatric center; (F) developmental disability center; (G) drug abuse treatment center; (H) family planning clinic; (I) penal institution; (J) hospice; or (K) public health facility; (16) "institutional pharmacy" means a pharmacy located in an institutional facility; (17) "licensee" means a person who is licensed under AS 08.80 and this chapter; (18) "live program" means an on-site continuing education activity, including a lecture, symposium, live teleconference, or workshop; (19) "sterile pharmaceutical" means a drug dosage form free from living microorganisms (aseptic); (20) "wholesale distribution" means distribution of prescription drugs to a person other than a consumer or patient, but does not include an activity described in 12 AAC 52.695.
(b) In AS 08.80.315(3), "other persons or governmental agencies" include investigators for the department who are assigned to conduct investigations under AS 08.
(c) In AS 08.80.030(b)(7), "monitoring of drug therapy" means a review of the drug therapy regimen of patients by a pharmacist for the purpose of evaluating and rendering advice to the prescribing practitioner regarding adjustment of the regimen.
"Monitoring of drug therapy" includes (1) collecting and reviewing records of patient drug use histories; (2) measuring and reviewing routine patient vital signs, including pulse, temperature, blood pressure, and respiration; and (3) ordering and evaluating the results of laboratory tests relating to drug therapy, including blood chemistries and cell counts, drug levels in blood, urine, tissue, or other body fluids, and culture and sensitivity tests that are performed in accordance with a written protocol approved under 12 AAC 52.240.
-29-
CHAPTER 01.
CENTRALIZED LICENSING.
Section 10.
20.
25.
30.
35.
40.
50.
60.
62.
65.
70.
75.
77.
80.
87.
89.
90.
100.
102.
103.
104.
105.
110.
Applicability of chapter Board organization Public members Quorum Appointments and terms Transportation and per diem Administrative duties of department Application for license Courtesy license Establishment of fees Administrative duties of boards Disciplinary powers of boards Conviction as grounds for disciplinary actions Department regulations Investigative and enforcement powers of department Copies of records for child support purposes Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act License renewal, lapse, and reinstatement Citation for unlicensed practice or activity Procedure and form of citation Failure to obey citation Penalty for improper payment Definitions 8.01.010.
Applicability of chapter.
This chapter applies to the Board of Public Accountancy (AS 08.04.010); regulation of acupuncturists under AS 08.06; State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers and Land Surveyors (AS 08.48.011); Athletic Commission (AS 05.05 and AS 05.10); regulation of audiologists and speech-language pathologists under AS 08.11; Board of Barbers and Hairdressers (AS 08.13.010); regulation of big game guides and transporters under AS 08.54; regulation of business licenses under AS 43.70; Board of Chiropractic Examiners (AS 08.20.010); regulation of collection agencies under AS 08.24; regulation of concert promoters under AS 08.92; regulation of construction contractors and home inspectors under AS 08.18; Board of Dental Examiners (AS 08.36.010); Board of Certified Direct-Entry Midwives (AS 08.65.010); regulation of dietitians and nutritionists under AS 08.38.
Board of Dispensing Opticians (AS 08.71.010); regulation of electrical and mechanical administrators under AS 08.40; regulation of professional geologists under AS 08.02.011 ; regulation of hearing aid dealers under AS 08.55; Board of Marine Pilots (AS 08.62.010); Board of Marital and Family Therapy (AS 08.63.010); State Medical Board (AS 08.64.010); repealed 7/1/99; regulation of morticians under AS 08.42; regulation of the practice of naturopathy under AS 08.45; Board of Nursing (AS 08.68.010); regulation of nursing home administrators under AS 08.70; Board of Examiners in Optometry (AS 08.72.010); Board of Pharmacy (AS 08.80.010); State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board (AS 08.84.010); Board of Professional Counselors (AS 08.29.010); Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners (AS 08.86.010); Real Estate Commission (AS 08.88.011); Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers (AS 08.87.010); Board of Social Work Examiners (AS 08.95.010); Board of Veterinary Examiners (AS 08.98.010);
Sec. 0 (1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) (8) (9) (10) (11) (12) (13) (14) (15) (16) (17) (18) (19) (20) (21) (22) (23) (24) (25) (26) (27) (28) (29) (30) (31) (32) (33) (34) (35) (36)
-30-
(37) regulation of agencies that perform euthanasia services under AS 08.02.050.
Sec. 08.01.020.
Board organization.
Board members are appointed by the governor and serve at the pleasure of the governor.
Unless otherwise provided, the governor may designate the chair of a board, and all other officers shall be elected by the board members.
Unless otherwise provided, officers of a board are the chair and the secretary.
A board may provide by regulation that three or more unexcused absences from meetings are cause for removal.
Sec. 08.01.025.
Public members.
A public member of a board may not: (1) be engaged in the occupation that the board regulates; (2) be associated by legal contract with a member of the occupation that the board regulates except as a consumer of the services provided by a practitioner of the occupation; or (3) have a direct financial interest in the occupation that the board regulates.
Sec. 08.01.030.
Quorum.
A majority of the membership of a board constitutes a quorum unless otherwise provided.
Sec. 08.01.035.
Appointments and terms.
Members of boards subject to this chapter are appointed for staggered terms of four years.
Except as provided in AS 39.05.080(4), a member of a board serves until a successor is appointed.
Except as provided in AS 39.05.080(4), an appointment to fill a vacancy on a board is for the remainder of the unexpired term.
A member who has served all or part of two successive terms on a board may not be reappointed to that board unless four years have elapsed since the person has last served on the board.
Sec. 08.01.040.
Transportation and per diem.
A board member is entitled to transportation expenses and per diem as set out in AS 39.20.180.
Sec. 08.01.050.
Administrative duties of department.
(a) The department shall perform the following administrative and budgetary services when appropriate: (1) collect and record fees; (2) maintain records and files; (3) issue and receive application forms; (4) notify applicants of acceptance or rejection as determined by the board or, for occupations or activities listed in AS 08.01.010 that are regulated directly by the department, as determined by the department under applicable law; (5) designate dates examinations are to be held and notify applicants; (6) publish notice of examinations and proceedings; (7) arrange space for holding examinations and proceedings; (8) notify applicants of results of examinations; (9) issue licenses or temporary licenses as authorized by the board or, for occupations or activities listed in AS 08.01.010 that are regulated directly by the department, as authorized by the department under applicable law; (10) issue duplicate licenses upon submission of a written request by the licensee attesting to loss of or the failure to receive the original and payment by the licensee of a fee established by regulation adopted by the department; (11) notify licensees of renewal dates at least 30 days before the expiration date of their licenses; (12) compile and maintain a current register of licensees; (13) answer routine inquiries; (14) maintain files relating to individual licensees; (15) arrange for printing and advertising; (16) purchase supplies; (17) employ additional help when needed; (18) perform other services that may be requested by the board; (19) provide inspection, enforcement, and investigative services to the boards and for the occupations listed in AS 08.01.010 regarding all licenses issued by or through the department; (20) retain and safeguard the official seal of a board and prepare, sign, and affix a board seal, as appropriate, for licenses approved by a board; (21) issue business licenses under AS 43.70.
(b) The form and content of a license, authorized by a board listed in AS 08.01.010, including any document evidencing renewal of a license, shall be determined by the department after consultation with and consideration of the views of the board concerned.
(c) Repealed, Sec. 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.
(d) At the request of one of the following boards, the department may contract with public agencies and private professional organizations to provide assistance and treatment to persons licensed by the board who abuse alcohol, other drugs, or other substances: (1) Board of Social Work Examiners; (2) Board of Dental Examiners;
-31-
(3) (4) (5) (6) (7) (8) (9) (10) (11) (12)
Board of Dispensing Opticians; State Medical Board; Board of Nursing; Board of Examiners in Optometry; Board of Pharmacy; State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board; Board of Professional Counselors; Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners; Board of Veterinary Examiners; and Board of Marital and Family Therapy.
Sec. 08.01.060.
Application for license.
(a) All applications for examination or licensing to engage in the business or profession covered by this chapter shall be made in writing to the department.
(b) If the applicant is a natural person, the application must require that the applicant submit the applicant's social security number to the department.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a license to engage in a profession may not be issued by the department to a natural person unless the social security number has been provided to the department.
Sec. 08.01.062.
Courtesy licenses.
(a) A board established under this title and the Department of Community and Economic Development, with respect to an occupation that it regulates under this title, may by regulation establish criteria for issuing a temporary courtesy license to nonresidents who enter the state so that, on a temporary basis, they may practice the occupation regulated by the board or the department.
(b) The regulations adopted under (a) of this section may include limitations relating to the (1) duration of the license's validity; (2) scope of practice allowed under the license; and (3) other matters considered important by the board or the department.
Sec. 08.01.065.
Establishment of fees.
(a) Except for business licenses, the department shall adopt regulations that establish the amount and manner of payment of application fees, examination fees, license fees, registration fees, permit fees, investigation fees, and all other fees as appropriate for the occupations covered by this chapter.
(b) Repealed 1992.
(c) Except as provided in (f) - (i) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected for an occupation approximately equals the actual regulatory costs for the occupation.
The department shall annually review each fee level to determine whether the regulatory costs of each occupation are approximately equal to fee collections related to that occupation.
If the review indicates that an occupation's fee collections and regulatory costs are not approximately equal, the department shall calculate fee adjustments and adopt regulations under (a) of this section to implement the adjustments.
In January of each year, the department shall report on all fee levels and revisions for the previous year under this subsection to the office of management and budget.
If a board regulates an occupation covered by this chapter, the department shall consider the board's recommendations concerning the occupation's fee levels and regulatory costs before revising fee schedules to comply with this subsection.
In this subsection, "regulatory costs" means costs of the department that are attributable to regulation of an occupation plus (1) all expenses of the board that regulates the occupation if the board regulates only one occupation; (2) the expenses of a board that are attributable to the occupation if the board regulates more than one occupation.
(d) The license fee for a business license is set by AS 43.70.030(a).
The department shall adopt regulations that establish the manner of payment of the license fee. (e) Repealed. (f) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department and the board for all occupations regulated by the board.
The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a certificate of registration issued under AS 08.48.211 so that the fee levels are the same for all occupations regulated by the board.
(g) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the department for all occupations regulated under AS 08.11 approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department for all occupations regulated by the department under AS 08.11.
The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of licenses issued under AS 08.11 so that the fee levels are the same for all occupations regulated by the department under AS 08.11.
(h) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department, the board, and the Department of Environmental Conservation for all occupations regulated by the board.
For purposes of this subsection, the regulatory costs of the Department of Environmental Conservation for the occupations regulated by the board include the cost of inspections under AS 08.13.210(b), the cost of developing and adopting regulations under AS 44.46.020 for barbershop, hairdressing, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, ear piercing, and tattooing and permanent cosmetic coloring establishments, and the cost to the
-32-
Department of Environmental Conservation of enforcing those regulations except for the enforcement costs relating to ear piercing establishments.
The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a practitioner's license issued under AS 08.13.100 so that the license and license renewal fees are the same for all occupations regulated by the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers. (i) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the Department of Community and Economic Development for specialty contractors, home inspectors, and associate home inspectors approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department for those three registration categories.
The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a certificate of registration issued under AS 08.18 so that the fee levels are the same for all three of these registration categories and so that the fee level for a home inspector with a joint registration is not different from the fee level for a home inspector who does not have a joint registration.
In this subsection, "joint registration" has the meaning given in AS 08.18.171.
Sec. 08.01.070.
Administrative duties of boards.
Each board shall perform the following duties in addition to those provided in its respective law: (1) take minutes and records of all proceedings; (2) hold a minimum of one meeting each year; (3) hold at least one examination each year; (4) request, through the department, investigation of violations of its laws and regulations; (5) prepare and grade board examinations; (6) set minimum qualifications for applicants for examination and license; (7) forward a draft of the minutes of proceedings to the department within 20 days after the proceedings; (8) forward results of board examinations to the department within 20 days after the examination is given; (9) notify the department of meeting dates and agenda items at least 15 days before meetings and other proceedings are held; (10) submit before the end of the fiscal year an annual performance report to the department stating the board's accomplishments, activities, and needs.
Sec. 08.01.075.
Disciplinary powers of boards.
(a) A board may take the following disciplinary actions, singly or in combination: (1) permanently revoke a license; (2) suspend a license for a specified period; (3) censure or reprimand a licensee; (4) impose limitations or conditions on the professional practice of a licensee; (5) require a licensee to submit to peer review; (6) impose requirements for remedial professional education to correct deficiencies in the education, training, and skill of the licensee; (7) impose probation requiring a licensee to report regularly to the board on matters related to the grounds for probation; (8) impose a civil fine not to exceed $5,000.
(b) A board may withdraw probationary status if the deficiencies that required the sanction are remedied. (c) A board may summarily suspend a licensee from the practice of the profession before a final hearing is held or during an appeal if the board finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety.
A person is entitled to a hearing before the board to appeal the summary suspension within seven days after the order of suspension is issued.
A person may appeal an adverse decision of the board on an appeal of a summary suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.
(d) A board may reinstate a suspended or revoked license if, after a hearing, the board finds that the applicant is able to practice the profession with skill and safety.
(e) A board may accept the voluntary surrender of a license.
A license may not be returned unless the board determines that the licensee is competent to resume practice and the licensee pays the appropriate renewal fee. (f) A board shall seek consistency in the application of disciplinary sanctions.
A board shall explain a significant departure from prior decisions involving similar facts in the order imposing the sanction.
Sec. 08.01.077.
Conviction as grounds for disciplinary action.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the conviction under AS 47.24.010 of a person licensed, certified, or regulated by the department or a board under this title may be considered by the department or board as grounds for disciplinary proceedings or sanctions.
Sec. 08.01.080.
Department regulations.
The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter including but not limited to describing (1) how an examination is to be conducted; (2) what is contained in application forms; (3) how a person applies for an examination or license.
Sec. 08.01.087.
Investigative and enforcement powers of department.
(a) The department may, upon its own motion, conduct investigations to
-33-
(1) determine whether a person has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, or a provision of AS 43.70, or a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with an occupation or board listed in AS 08.01.010; or (2) secure information useful in the administration of this chapter.
(b) If it appears to the commissioner that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice in violation of a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, or a provision of AS 43.70, or a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with an occupation or board listed in AS 08.01.010, the commissioner may, if the commissioner considers it in the public interest, and after notification of a proposed order or action by telephone, telegraph, or facsimile to all board members, if a board regulates the act or practice involved, unless a majority of the members of the board object within 10 days.
(1) issue an order directing the person to stop the act or practice; however, reasonable notice of and an opportunity for a hearing must first be given to the person, except that the commissioner may issue a temporary order before a hearing is held; a temporary order remains in effect until a final order affirming, modifying, or reversing the temporary order is issued or until 15 days after the person receives the notice and has not requested a hearing by that time; a temporary order becomes final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not request a hearing within 15 days after receiving the notice; the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall be the hearing officer at the hearing and shall issue a final order within 10 days after the hearing; (2) bring an action in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter, a regulation adopted under it, an order issued under it, or with a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with business licenses or an occupation or board listed in AS 08.01.010; (3) examine or have examined the books and records of a person whose business activities require a business license or licensure by a board listed in AS 08.01.010, or whose occupation is listed in AS 08.01.010; the commissioner may require the person to pay the reasonable costs of the examination; and (4) issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, records, and other documents.
(c) Under procedures and standards of operation established by the department by regulation, and with the agreement of the appropriate agency, the department may designate appropriate state or municipal agencies to investigate reports of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property by certified nurse aids.
Sec. 08.01.089.
Copies of records for child support purposes.
If a copy of a public record concerning an individual who owes or is owed child support that is prepared or maintained by the department is requested by the child support enforcement agency created in AS 25.27.010 or a child support enforcement agency of another state, the department shall provide the requesting agency with a certified copy of the public record, including the individual's social security number.
If these records are prepared or maintained by the department in an electronic data base, the records may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic record and a statement certifying its contents.
A requesting agency receiving information under this section may use it only for child support purposes authorized under law.
Sec. 08.01.090.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.
The Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) applies to regulations adopted and proceedings held under this chapter, except those under AS 08.01.087(b) and actions taken under AS 08.68.333(c).
Sec. 08.01.100.
License renewal, lapse, and reinstatement.
(a) Licenses shall be renewed biennially on the dates set by the department with the approval of the respective board.
(b) A license subject to renewal shall be renewed on or before the date set by the department.
If the license is not renewed by the date set by the department, the license lapses.
In addition to renewal fees required for reinstatement of the lapsed license, the department may impose a delayed renewal penalty, established by regulation, that shall be paid before a license that has been lapsed for more than 60 days may be renewed.
The department may adopt a delayed renewal penalty only with the concurrence of the appropriate board.
(c) When continuing education or other requirements are made a condition of license renewal, the requirements shall be satisfied before a license is renewed.
(d) Except as otherwise provided, a license may not be renewed if it has been lapsed for five years or more.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a renewal of a license may not be issued by the department to a natural person unless the licensee's social security number has been provided to the department.
Sec. 08.01.102.
Citation for violation of a license requirement practiced a profession or engaged violation continues after a citation unlicensed practice or activity.
The department may issue a citation for a under this chapter or AS 43.70 if there is probable cause to believe a person has in business for which a license is required without holding the license.
Each day a for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.
(a) A citation issued under AS 08.01.102 must be in writing.
notice to appear in court.
citation issued under AS 08.01.102 shall be at least five days, ce of the citation, unless the person cited requests an earlier
Sec. 08.01.103.
Procedure and form of citation.
A person receiving the citation is not required to sign a (b) The time specified in the notice to appear on a not including weekends and holidays, after the issuan hearing.
-34-
(c) The department is responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations, and shall maintain a record of each book issued and each citation contained in it.
The department shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to an employee of the department.
(d) The department shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense.
Upon its deposit with the court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action taken by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor.
The department may not dispose of a citation, copies of it, or of the record of its issuance except as required under this subsection and (e) of this section.
(e) The department shall require the return of a copy of every citation issued by the department and all copies of a citation that has been spoiled or upon which an entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator.
The department shall also maintain, in connection with each citation, a record of the disposition of the charge by the court where the original or copy of the citation was deposited.
(f) If the form of citation includes the essential facts constituting the offense charged, and if the citation is sworn to as required under the laws of this state for a complaint charging commission of the offense alleged in the citation, then the citation when filed with a court having jurisdiction is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.
Sec. 08.01.104.
Failure to obey citation.
Unless the citation has been voided or otherwise dismissed by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor, a person who without lawful justification or excuse fails to appear in court to answer a citation issued under AS 08.01.102, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 08.01.105.
Penalty for improper payment.
An applicant shall pay a penalty of $10 each time a negotiable instrument is presented to the department in payment of an amount due and payment is subsequently refused by the named payor.
Sec. 08.01.110.
Definitions.
In this chapter (1) "board" includes the boards and commissions listed in AS 08.01.010; (2) "commissioner" means the commissioner of community and economic development; (3) "department" means the Department of Community and Economic Development; (4) "license" means a business license or a license, certificate, permit, or registration or similar evidence of authority issued for an occupation by the department or by one of the boards listed in AS 08.01.010; (5) "licensee" means a person who holds a license; (6) "occupation" means a trade or profession listed in AS 08.01.010.
CHAPTER 02.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS.
Section 10.
11.
20.
40.
50.
Professional designation requirements Professional geologist Limitation of liability Access to certain mental health information and records by the state Permits for use of drugs to euthanize domestic animals
Sec. 08.02.010.
Professional designation requirements.
(a) An acupuncturist licensed under AS 08.06, an audiologist or speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11, a person licensed in the state as a chiropractor under AS 08.20, a professional counselor licensed under AS 08.29, a dentist under AS 08.36, a dietitian or nutritionist licensed under AS 08.38, a marital and family therapist licensed under AS 08.63, a medical practitioner or osteopath under AS 08.64, a direct-entry midwife certified under AS 08.65, a registered nurse under AS 08.68, an optometrist under AS 08.72, a licensed pharmacist under AS 08.80, a physical therapist or occupational therapist licensed under AS 08.84, a psychologist under AS 08.86, or a clinical social worker licensed under AS 08.95, shall use as professional identification appropriate letters or a title after that person's name that represents the person's specific field of practice.
The letters or title shall appear on all signs, stationery, or other advertising in which the person offers or displays personal professional services to the public.
In addition, a person engaged in the practice of medicine or osteopathy as defined in AS 08.64.380, or a person engaged in any manner in the healing arts who diagnoses, treats, tests, or counsels other persons in relation to human health or disease and uses the letters "M.D." or the title "doctor" or "physician" or another title that tends to show that the person is willing or qualified to diagnose, treat, test, or counsel another person, shall clarify the letters or title by adding the appropriate specialist designation, if any, such as "dermatologist", "radiologist", "audiologist", "naturopath", or the like.
(b) A person subject to (a) of this section who fails to comply with the requirements of (a) of this section shall be given notice of noncompliance by that person's appropriate licensing board or, if the person is not regulated by the board, by the department.
If, after a reasonable time, with opportunity for a hearing, the person's noncompliance continues, the board or department, as appropriate, may suspend or revoke the person's license or registration, or administer other disciplinary action which in its determination is appropriate.
-35-
Sec. 08.02.011.
Professional geologist.
The commissioner of community and economic development shall certify an applicant as a professional geologist if the applicant is certified as a professional geologist by the American Institute of Professional Geologists.
Sec. 08.02.020.
Limitation of liability.
An action may not be brought against a person for damages resulting from (1) the person's good faith performance of a duty, function, or activity required as a (A) member of, or witness before, a licensing board or peer review committee established to review a licensing matter; (B) member of a committee appointed under AS 08.64.336(c); (C) contractor or agent of a contractor under AS 08.01.050(d) or AS 08.64.101(6); (2) a recommendation or action in accordance with the prescribed duties of a licensing board, peer review committee established to review a licensing matter, committee appointed under AS 08.64.336(c), or contractor or agent of a contractor under AS 08.01.050(d) or AS 08.64.101(5) when the person acts in the reasonable belief that the action or recommendation is warranted by facts known to the person, board, peer review committee, committee appointed under AS 08.64.336(c), or contractor or agent of the contractor under AS 08.01.050(d) or AS 08.64.101(5) after reasonable efforts to ascertain the facts upon which the action or recommendation is made; or (3) a report made in good faith to a public agency by the person, or participation by the person in an investigation by a public agency or a judicial or administrative proceeding relating to the report, if the report relates to the abuse of alcohol, other drugs, or other substances by a person licensed by a board listed in AS 08.01.050(d).
Sec. 08.02.040.
Access to certain mental health information and records by the state.
(a) Notwithstanding AS 08.29.200, AS 08.63.200, AS 08.86.200, AS 08.95.900, another provision of this title, or a regulation adopted under this title, a licensee or an entity employing or contracting with a licensee may disclose confidential patient mental health information, communications, and records to the Department of Health and Social Services when disclosure is authorized under AS 47.30.540, 47.30.590, 47.30.845, or AS 47.31.032.
Information, communications, and records received by the Department of Health and Social Services under this section are confidential medical records of patients and are not open to public inspection and copying under AS 40.25.110 ­ 40.25.120.
(b) In this section, "licensee" has the meaning given in AS 08.01.110.
Sec. 08.02.050.
Permits for use of drugs to euthanize domestic animals.
(a) A qualified agency may apply to the department and obtain a permit that authorizes the purchase, possession, and use by the agency of sodium pentobarbital, sodium pentobarbital with lidocaine, and other drugs authorized in regulations adopted by the department for the purpose of euthanizing injured, sick, or abandoned domestic animals in the lawful possession of the agency.
To qualify to obtain the permit, the agency shall certify that it will (1) comply with applicable federal laws related to the use of the drugs; and (2) not permit an employee to administer the drugs unless the employee has successfully completed a euthanasia technician certification course approved by the National Animal Control Association, the American Humane Association, or the Humane Society of the United States.
(b) The department may revoke or suspend a permit or take another disciplinary action under AS 08.01.075 if it determines that the agency or an employee of the agency (1) improperly used sodium pentobarbital, sodium pentobarbital with lidocaine, or another drug authorized for use under this section; (2) failed to follow federal or state laws regarding proper storage and handling of the drugs; (3) allowed an employee to administer the drugs before the employee successfully completed the certification course described in (a)(2) of this section; or (4) violated this title or a regulation adopted under this title.
(c) In this section, "agency" means an animal control agency of a municipality or recognized governmental entity or an entity that has contracted with a municipality or recognized governmental entity to perform animal control or animal euthanasia services.
(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.
-36-
CHAPTER 03.
TERMINATION, CONTINUATION AND REESTABLISHMENT OF REGULATORY BOARDS.
Section 10.
Termination dates for regulatory boards 20.
Procedures governing termination, transition, and continuation Sec. 08.03.010.
Termination dates for regulatory boards.
(a) [Repealed, Sec. 4 ch 14 SLA 1987]. (b) [Repealed, Sec. 4 ch 14 SLA 1987]
(d) [Repealed, Sec. 3 ch 74 SLA 1979]. (e) [Repealed, Sec. 3 ch 74 SLA 1979]
Sec. 08.03.020.
Procedures governing termination, transition, and continuation.
(a) Upon termination, each board listed in AS 08.03.010 shall continue in existence until June 30 of the next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs.
During this period, termination does not reduce or otherwise limit the powers or authority of each board.
One year after the date of termination, a board not continued shall cease all activities.
(b) The termination, dissolution, continuation or reestablishment of a regulatory board shall be governed by the legislative oversight procedures of AS 44.66.050.
(c) A board scheduled for termination under this chapter may be continued or reestablished by the legislature for a period not to exceed four years unless the board is continued or reestablished for a longer period under AS 08.03.010.
-37-
CHAPTER 02.
DIVISION OF OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING.
Article 1.
Collection of Fees (12 AAC 02.010 -- 12 AAC 02.030) 2.
Occupational Licensing Fees (12 AAC 02.100 -- 12 AAC 02.360) 3.
Examination Review Procedures (12 AAC 02.400) 4.
General Provisions (12 AAC 02.900 -- 12 AAC 02.990) Article 1.
COLLECTION OF FEES.
Section 10.
15.
20.
30.
Licensing Refund of Prorating Prorating and renewal fees license fees renewal fees initial renewal fees
12 AAC 02.010.
LICENSING AND RENEWAL FEES. (a) The department will collect fees for licensing and for license renewal for the boards and professions listed in AS 08.01.010.
(b) The department will not issue a license or renew a license unless the applicable fees established in AS 08 or in this chapter have been collected.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an application for initial licensure or renewal of license will be considered filed as of the filing date of the document, as determined by 12 AAC 02.920.
(d) Repealed 5/4/90.
(e) An application fee is not refundable.
12 AAC 02.015.
REFUND OF LICENSE FEES. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, after a license is initially issued or renewed, the department will not refund the initial license fee or the license renewal fee. (b) On request, the department will issue a prorated refund of a license fee paid for a licensing period in which the individual licensee dies.
The department will issue the refund to the estate of the licensee.
The department will not issue a refund when the estate of the licensee remains a partner in a partnership that received a license under AS 08.
(c) To request a refund under this section, the estate of the licensee shall submit to the department (1) a written request for a refund within 12 months of the licensee's death or before the end of the licensing period in which the licensee died, whichever time period is greater; and (2) verification of the licensee's death; the department will accept a letter from a coroner or mortuary, a death certificate, or a copy of a newspaper article as verification.
(d) The department will calculate the amount of the prorated refund described in (b) of this section based on the number of complete months remaining in the licensing period on the date of the licensee's death.
12 AAC 02.020.
PRORATING RENEWAL FEES.
The department will prorate the first license renewal fees following initial licensure, in accordance with 12 AAC 02.030.
All renewal fees, including penalty and delinquent fees must be paid by the licensee applying for renewal of a license, except as provided in 12 AAC 02.030(a)(1) and (b)(1).
12 AAC 02.030.
PRORATING INITIAL RENEWAL FEES. (a) When the department issues an initial biennial license (1) within the 90 days before the date by which it must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee but is not required to pay the prescribed renewal fee until the second renewal date; (2) within the 12 months before the date by which the license must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee, and shall pay one-half of the prescribed renewal fee at the time of renewal; or (3) more than 12 months before the date by which the license must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee, and shall pay the entire prescribed renewal fee at the time of renewal.
(b) When the department issues an initial annual license (1) within the 90 days before the date by which it must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee but is not required to pay the prescribed renewal fee until the second renewal date; (2) within the six months before the date by which the license must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee, and shall pay one-half of the prescribed renewal fee at the time of renewal; or
-38-
(3) more than six months before the date by which the license must be renewed, the applicant shall pay the entire license fee, and shall pay the entire prescribed renewal fee at the time of renewal.
(c) Repealed 12/28/97.
(d) When the department issues a renewed license for a licensing period beginning before January 1, 1998, the department will not prorate the renewal fee if the initial licensing fee was $150 or less.
When the department issues a renewed license for a licensing period beginning on or after January 1, 1998, the department will prorate the renewal fee in accordance with this section regardless of the amount of the initial licensing fee. (e) The department will not prorate fees for applications, examinations, reexaminations, credential review or investigation, temporary or emergency permits, locum tenens permits, certificates, or other such fees established in AS 08 or in this chapter.
Article 2.
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING FEES.
Section 100.
102.
105.
310.
Fees established by department Fees for a temporary license issued under AS 14.43.148 or AS 25.27.244; waivers; refunds Administrative fees Board of pharmacy
12 AAC 02.100.
FEES ESTABLISHED BY DEPARTMENT.
The fees established in this chapter have been adopted by the department after considering any recommendations of the applicable board or commission listed in AS 08.01.010.
12 AAC 02.102.
FEES FOR A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED UNDER AS 14.43.148 OR AS 25.27.244; WAIVERS; REFUNDS.
(a) When the division issues a temporary license under AS 14.43.148 or AS 25.27.244, the division will collect the annual or biennial license fee for the trade or profession for which the temporary license is issued, subject to the refund and waiver provisions set out in this section.
The temporary license fee is the amount paid to the division under this section from the annual or biennial license fee that is not refunded or waived under this section.
(b) When an individual who holds a temporary license issued under AS 14.43.148 is (1) issued a notice of release by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education and takes the action necessary, on or before the expiration date of the temporary license, to convert the temporary license to an annual or biennial license under AS 05.10, AS 08, or AS 46.03.375, the division will waive one-half of the annual or biennial license fee for the trade or profession for which the individual is receiving an annual or biennial license; (2) not issued a notice of release by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education on or before the expiration date of the temporary license, the department will (A) refund one-half of the annual or biennial license fee paid under (a) of this section; and (B) not refund a bond, cash deposit, negotiable instrument, or other mechanism to provide proof of financial responsibility that was deposited for claims under AS 05.10.090, AS 08, or this chapter, except as required by law.
(c) When an individual who holds a temporary license issued under AS 25.27.244 is (1) issued a release by the child support enforcement agency and takes the action necessary, on or before the expiration date of the temporary license, to convert the temporary license to an annual or biennial license under AS 05.10, AS 08, or AS 46.03.375, the division will waive one-half of the annual or biennial license fee for the trade or profession for which the individual is receiving an annual or biennial license; (2) not issued a notice of release by the child support enforcement agency on or before the expiration date of the temporary license, the department will (A) refund one-half of the annual or biennial license fee paid under (a) of this section; and (B) not refund a bond, cash deposit, negotiable instrument, or other mechanism to provide proof of financial responsibility that was deposited for claims under AS 05.10.090, AS 08, or this chapter, except as required by law.
(d) In this section, "annual or biennial license fee" means the initial license fee or the license renewal fee established in (1) AS 05.10.120 or this chapter for a licensing category included under the trades and professions listed in AS 08.01.010; and (2) 18 AAC 78.495 for certification as an underground storage tank worker.
12 AAC 02.105.
ADMINISTRATIVE FEES.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter for a particular board or occupation, the following fees apply to all boards and professions listed in AS 08.01.010: (1) duplicate license fee, $5; (2) fee for verification or certification of an Alaska license, registration, or examination, $20; (3) name change, except for construction contractors, $5; (4) photocopy fee, $.25 per page, which may be waived by the department if the total fee is less than $5;
-39-
(5) (6) (7) (8) (9) (10) (11) supplies; (12) (13)
facsimile fee, $1 per page, which may be waived by the department if the total fee is less than $5; returned check fee, $20; repealed 12/28/97; exam postponement fee, $25; wall certificate fee, $20; fee for proctoring an examination for another state's applicant, $50; fee for specialized report of licensing data that the department has agreed to provide, $100 plus the cost of
express delivery handling fee, $20; fee for providing the most recently printed roster of all (A) licensees in a licensing program, other than business licensing, with 2,000 or less licensees, $5; (B) licensees in a licensing program, other than business licensing, with more than 2,000 licensees, $15; (C) current business licenses, $100; (14) fee for a courtesy license issued under 12 AAC 02.955, $100; (15) courtesy license application fee, $50; (16) examination review fee, $50.
12 AAC 02.310.
BOARD OF PHARMACY.
(a) The following fees are established for pharmacists, pharmacy interns, pharmacy technicians, pharmacies, wholesale drug distributors, and drug dispensaries: (1) application fee for initial license, $50 (2) repealed 10/28/2000; (3) temporary pharmacist license fee, $50; (4) emergency permit to practice pharmacy fee, $90; (5) pharmacy intern license fee, $50.
(b) The following license and registration fees for all or part of the initial biennial licensing or registration period and subsequent biennial license and registration renewal fees are established for pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, pharmacies, and wholesale drug distributors: (1) pharmacist, $180; (2) wholesale drug distributors, $200; (3) pharmacy, $100; (4) repealed 6/13/2002; (5) drug room, $100; (6) repealed 10/19/97; (7) registered pharmacy located outside of the state, $100; and (8) pharmacy technician, $50.
Article 3.
EXAMINATION REVIEW PROCEDURES.
Section 400.
Examination review 12 AAC 02.400.
EXAMINATION REVIEW.
(a) The division will follow the examination review procedures established in this section unless the public or private organization that prepares and owns the examination has procedures for examination review that conflict with the procedures in this section.
When there is a conflict, the division will follow the procedures of the public or private organization that prepares and owns the examination.
(b) An applicant who wishes to review a failed examination shall submit a written request, and the applicable examination review fee specified in this chapter, to the division within 30 days after the notice of examination results was mailed to the applicant.
(c) All examination reviews will be conducted in the presence of division staff or the division's designee at the time and location determined by the division.
An examination review will not be conducted within 30 days of the next examination the applicant is scheduled to take.
(d) Only an applicant who has failed an examination may participate in the examination review and the applicant may review only his or her own examination.
(e) An applicant may use the same reference materials during an examination review that were allowed during the examination itself, but applicants may not use other materials or take notes or make copies of any kind.
All materials brought to an examination review are subject to inspection by the division staff.
(f) An applicant may challenge questions on the examination by submitting the challenge in writing during the time allowed to conduct the examination review under (h) of this section.
The written challenge to an examination question must include (1) the applicant's name; (2) the date of the examination; (3) the title of the examination; (4) the number of the question being challenged; and
-40-
(5) a detailed explanation of the reason for the challenge.
(g) A challenge to an examination question will be reviewed by the division, licensing board, or the public or private organization administering the examination.
If the division, licensing board, or public or private organization administering the examination sustains a challenge to an examination question, the department will give credit to the applicant for that question.
(h) To conduct the examination review, the division will allow the applicant challenging a question under (f) of this section one half of the length of time that was allowed for the taking of the examination being reviewed.
(i) Unless otherwise provided by an organization that provides or administers an examination for the division or the release is prohibited by law or contract, the division will provide an applicant who requests an examination review with the questions answered incorrectly on the failed examination and the answer that the applicant selected only.
If the examination contains multiple choice questions, the applicant may be provided with all of the answer selections to each failed question without identification of the correct answers.
Article 4.
GENERAL PROVISIONS Section 900.
910.
920.
930.
940.
955.
960.
965.
990.
Name and address changes Abandoned applications Filing date Date of lapsed license Effective date of renewed licenses Courtesy license Audit of compliance with continuing competency requirements Failure to meet continuing education requirements for renewal and reinstatement of license Definitions
12 AAC 02.900.
NAME AND ADDRESS CHANGES.
(a) A person licensed, registered, or certified by a board or commission listed in AS 08.01.010, or in an occupation listed in AS 08.01.010, shall maintain a current, valid, mailing address on file with the division at all times.
The latest mailing address on file with the division is the address that will be used for official communications, notifications, and service of legal process.
(b) A licensee must notify the division in writing, of a change of the licensee's address.
(c) If a licensee has a change of name, the licensee shall submit to the division within 30 days of the change of name (1) notification of the change of the licensee's name, on a form provided by the division that has been completed by the licensee and notarized; (2) a copy of the marriage certificate, court document, or other legal document verifying the change of name; and (3) the fee established in 12 AAC 02.105 for a name change.
(d) The division will issue a new license showing the change of name if a licensee meets the requirements in (c) of this section.
12 AAC 02.910.
ABANDONED APPLICATIONS.
(a) Except if procedures are otherwise expressly provided in this title for a particular board or occupation, an application is considered abandoned when (1) 12 months have elapsed since correspondence was last received from or on behalf of the applicant; or (2) the applicant has failed to appear for two successive examinations.
(b) An abandoned application is denied without prejudice and the application fee forfeited. (c) At the time an application is considered abandoned, the division will send notification of abandonment to the last known address of the applicant.
An applicant may request a refund of all unused examination and licensing fees credited to the application by submitting a written request for refund within 30 days from the date notification of abandonment was mailed by the division.
If no request for refund is received, all fees are forfeited.
12 AAC 02.920.
FILING DATE. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a document submitted to the division will be considered filed as of the postmark date of the document.
If the document is submitted by a method that does not provide a postmark date, the document will be considered filed as of the date stamped on the document, when it is received in the division office.
(b) If a filing deadline established in AS 08 or this title falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or state holiday, the deadline will be extended to the next regular state business day.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "postmark date" means the date of a document with prepaid postage and correctly addressed to the division by the United States Postal Service or other established domestic courier service.
12 AAC 02.930.
DATE OF LICENSE LAPSE.
For the purposes of AS 08.01.100, if a person licensed by the department or by one of the boards or commissions under AS 08.01.010 was issued a temporary license under
-41-
AS 14.43.148 or AS 25.27.244 and the temporary license was not converted to an annual or biennial license under AS 05.10, or AS 08, or AS 46.03.375, the lapsed period begins from the date that the temporary license expired.
12 AAC 02.940.
EFFECTIVE DATE OF RENEWED LICENSES.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, the effective date of a renewed license will be the date a complete renewal application is filed with the division as determined by 12 AAC 02.920.
A complete application includes (1) a completed renewal form; (2) any applicable renewal fees required by this chapter; and (3) documentation of fulfillment of all applicable prerequisites to license renewal, such as continuing competency, recent experience, insurance coverage, or other requirements.
(b) The division will, in its discretion, show a retroactive effective date on a licensee's renewed license if the licensee (1) holds a license that has been lapsed less than 60 days; (2) requests in writing that the division issue a renewed license showing an effective date that is earlier than the date the renewed license was issued; (3) documents that the licensee was in substantial compliance with the renewal requirements in (a) of this section as of the requested effective date; and (4) establishes to the satisfaction of the division that the licensee made a good faith effort to strictly comply with the renewal requirements.
(c) The division will not issue a renewed license with an effective date that is earlier than the postmark date of the licensee's first written attempt to renew the licensee's license.
"Written attempt to renew" means an effort by the licensee to submit the proper documentation to comply with the license renewal requirements.
A request for a renewal application form alone does not constitute a "written attempt to renew."
12 AAC 02.955.
COURTESY LICENSE.
(a) If an applicant meets the requirements of this section, the department will issue a courtesy license authorizing the holder to practice one of the following professions for the limited purpose recognized by the division: (1) acupuncturist under AS 08.06; (2) audiologist under AS 08.11; (3) electrical administrator or mechanical administrator under AS 08.40; (4) funeral director or embalmer under AS 08.42; (5) naturopath under AS 08.45.
(b) A courtesy license issued under (a) of this section authorizes the holder to practice the profession or occupation for which the license is issued for a limited purpose recognized by the division under (f) of this section.
A courtesy license does not authorize the holder to practice the profession outside the scope of the limited purpose for which the courtesy license is issued.
(c) An applicant for a courtesy license issued under (a) of this section shall submit to the department (1) a completed application on a form provided by the department; (2) the fee established in 12 AAC 02.105 for a courtesy license; (3) a sworn statement, signed by the applicant before a notary, that the applicant is not a resident of this state; (4) verification of a current license in another licensing jurisdiction to practice the profession for which a courtesy license is requested; the license in that jurisdiction must be active, in good standing, and cover the scope of practice required for the limited purpose of the courtesy license; (5) a description of the limited purpose of the courtesy license and the applicant's intended scope of practice under the courtesy license; and (6) a sworn statement, signed by the applicant before a notary, that the applicant has not previously been denied a license or had a license revoked in this or another state or other licensing jurisdiction for the profession that the courtesy license is sought.
(d) A courtesy license issued under (a) of this section is valid for no more than 90 consecutive days.
The department will not issue more than two courtesy licenses for the profession to an individual within a consecutive eighteen-month period.
(e) The holder of a courtesy license issued under (a) of this section is obligated to uphold the standards of practice identified in AS 08 and in this title for the relevant profession and is subject to the relevant disciplinary provisions in AS 08 and this title.
(f) The department will recognize the following limited purposes for a courtesy license issued under (a) of this section: (1) provision of professional services in an emergency situation specifically recognized by the department; the department will, in its discretion, restrict the license to cover only the professional services required to respond to the emergency situation, if the department finds that the courtesy license is only needed for this purpose; (2) instruction or provision of professional services at a clinic or seminar focused on a subject in which the applicant for a courtesy license is a specialist.
12 AAC 02.960.
AUDIT OF COMPLIANCE WITH CONTINUING COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS.
(a) The department will audit compliance of licensees with continuing competency requirements in accordance with this section if
-42-
(1) the licensee is required to meet continuing competency requirements under AS 08 or this title; (2) any board or commission that regulates the profession has requested the department's assistance; and (3) AS 08 or this title does not provide a different method for monitoring compliance.
(b) A licensee subject to audit under (a) of this section and applying for license renewal shall (1) complete and sign a statement of compliance with continuing competency requirements; and (2) submit the statement to the department with the application for license renewal.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this section, the department will select licensees for audit under (a) of this section as follows: (1) ten percent of the total number of licensees in that profession if the total number of licensees is less than 3,000; or (2) five percent of the total number of licensees in that profession if the total number of licensees is 3,000 or more.
(d) The department will require that a different percent of licensees be selected for audit, if the board that regulates the profession, or the department for a profession not regulated by a board or commission, finds that a different percent to be audited is necessary to protect public health and safety.
(e) A licensee selected for audit under (c) or (d) of this section will be notified by the department.
Within 30 days of notification, the licensee shall submit to the department, documentation to verify completion of the continuing competency activities claimed on the statement submitted with the application for license renewal.
The documentation must include a valid copy of a certificate or similar verification of satisfactory completion of the continuing competency activities claimed that provides (1) the name of the licensee; (2) the amount of continuing competency credit awarded; (3) a description of the continuing competency activity; (4) the dates of participation; and (5) the name, mailing address and signature of the instructor, sponsor, or other verifier. (f) A licensee subject to audit under (a) of this section is responsible for maintaining adequate and detailed records of all continuing competency activities completed and shall make the records available to the department on request.
A licensee shall maintain the records until the later of (1) four years from the date of completion of the continuing competency activity; or (2) if the licensee was selected for audit, the date that the department notifies the licensee that the audit is completed.
(g) The department will extend the period for providing documentation of completion of continuing competency activities if the department finds that the licensee has good cause for the need for additional time to submit the documentation required in (e) of this section.
(h) The department will notify the respective board of a licensee's failure to comply with the department's request for records under (e) of this section.
(i) For professions licensed by the department, the department will consider the licensee's failure to comply with the department's request for records under (e) of this section as grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions to the extent allowed under AS 08 and this title.
12 AAC 02.965.
FAILURE TO MEET CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR RENEWAL AND REINSTATEMENT OF LICENSE.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in AS 08 or this title, a license issued under AS 08 will not be renewed or reinstated if the applicant for renewal or reinstatement has not earned the required number of continuing education credits.
The applicant may earn the required number of credits after the expiration date of the license.
Continuing education credits earned to reinstate or renew an expired license may not be used to satisfy the continuing education requirements for a future renewal or reinstatement.
Credits submitted to satisfy the continuing education requirements under this section must be approved under AS 08 and this title by the department or the applicable board.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "continuing education credits" includes continuing competency, contact hours, continuing education units (CEU's), and credit hours.
12 AAC 02.990.
DEFINITIONS.
As used in this chapter (1) "department" means the Department of Community and Economic Development; (2) "division" means the division of occupational licensing, Department of Community and Economic Development; (3) "license" means a license, certificate, permit, registration, or similar evidence of authority issued by the division or by one of the boards listed in AS 08.01.010; (4) "licensee" means a person who holds a license issued by the division or by one of the boards listed in AS 08.01.010.
-43-
CHAPTER 30.
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES ARTICLE 1.
REGULATION OF MANUFACTURE, DISTRIBUTION, PRESCRIPTION, AND DISPENSING OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES Section 20.
60.
70.
80.
Registration requirements Records of registrants Order forms; prescriptions Unlawful administration, prescriptions and Dispensation of controlled substances
Sec. 17.30.020.
Registration Requirements.
(a) A person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state or who proposes to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance in the state, shall comply with the registration requirements of 21 U.S.C. 811--830 (Controlled Substances Act), and the regulations adopted under those sections.
(b) A person registered under federal law to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances in the state may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized by the person's registration and in conformity with the other provisions of this chapter.
(c) [Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]
(d) [Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]
(e) [Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]
(f) A peace officer may enter a registrant's premises at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to inspect the premises and records required to be maintained under federal law.
An inspection may not extend to financial data, pricing data, or sales data, other than shipment data, unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the premises consents.
(g) Upon request from a peace officer, a person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state shall provide evidence of current registration under 21 U.S.C. 811-830 (Controlled Substances Act) and the regulations adopted under those sections.
Sec. 17.30.060.
Records of registrants.
A person registered under federal law to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances in the state shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the record keeping and inventory requirements of federal law.
Sec. 17.30.070.
Order forms; prescriptions.
(a) A controlled substance may be distributed by one registrant to another registrant only if the distribution is in accordance with federal requirements for order forms.
(b) A controlled substance may not be dispensed by a practitioner other than in accordance with federal requirements regarding prescriptions for controlled substances.
(c) If the classification of a controlled substance in a schedule set out in AS 11.71.140--11.71.190 is different from its corresponding classification under federal law, the requirements of (a) and (b) of this section are determined by the classification of the substance under federal law.
Sec. 17.30.080.
Unlawful administration, prescription and dispensation of controlled substances.
(a) A controlled substance classified under federal law or in a schedule set out in AS 11.71.140--11.71.190 may not be administered, prescribed, dispensed, or distributed other than for a medical purpose.
(b) A person who violates (a) of this section, or who otherwise manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or conducts research with a controlled substance in the state without fully complying with 21 U.S.C. 811-830 (Controlled Substances Act), and regulations adopted under those sections, is guilty of misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS 11.71.010--11.71.070 in the degree appropriate to the circumstances as described in those sections.
ARTICLE 2.
ENFORCEMENT FORFEITURE AND REVIEW PROVISIONS Section 100.
110.
112.
114.
116.
118.
Powers of the department of public safety Items subject to forfeiture Proceedings resulting in forfeiture Seizure and custody of property Procedure for forfeiture action Petition for release of seized items
-44-
120.
122.
124.
126.
Petition for sale of seized item State disposal of forfeited property Remittance of claimant Forfeiture of controlled substances
Sec. 17.30.100.
Powers of the department of public safety.
(a) The commissioner of public safety shall enforce this chapter and shall cooperate with other state and federal agencies in the discharge of their responsibilities pertaining to illicit traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances.
Under this section, the powers of the commissioner of public safety include but are not limited to the following: (1) arranging for the exchange of information among government officials concerning illicit traffic in and abuse of controlled substances; (2) coordinating training programs pertaining to controlled substances at both local and state levels; (3) cooperating with the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including records of persons who have violated the provisions of this chapter or AS 11.71 in the state and making the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes; and (4) instituting in the superior court, actions for injunctions against continued manufacture, distribution, dispensation, or research with a controlled substance in the state by a person who violates 21 U.S.C. 811--830 (Controlled Substances Act) or the regulations adopted under those sections.
(b) The commissioner of public safety may not furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under AS 17.30.155.
(c) The Department of Public Safety, in accordance with AS 37.07 (the Executive Budget Act), may apply for and accept money necessary to exchange information concerning narcotics trafficking between the states, or otherwise related to the enforcement of AS 11.71 or AS 11.73.
(d) The Department of Public Safety or a local law enforcement agency may accept from the United States Attorney General property, including money, that is forfeited under 21 U.S.C. 881 (the Controlled Substances Act).
The Department of Public Safety and local law enforcement agencies shall, in accordance with 21 U.S.C. 881 (e) and regulations and policies adopted under that section, use property and the proceeds of property obtained under this subsection in the enforcement of this chapter, AS 11.71, and municipal ordinances substantially similar to this chapter and AS 11.71.
Sec. 17.30.110.
Items subject to forfeiture.
The following may be forfeited to the state: (1) a controlled substance which has been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, or possessed in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71; (2) raw materials, products, and equipment which are used or intended for use in manufacturing, distributing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting a controlled substance which is a felony under this chapter or AS 11.71; (3) property which is used or intended for use as a container for property described in (1) or (2) of this section; (4) a conveyance, including but not limited to aircraft, vehicles or vessels, which has been used or is intended for use in transporting or in any manner in facilitating the transportation, sale, receipt, possession, or concealment of property described in (1) or (2) of this section in violation of a felony offense under this chapter or AS 11.71; however, (A) a conveyance may not be forfeited under this paragraph if the owner of the conveyance establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, at a hearing before the court as the trier of fact, that use of the conveyance in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 was committed by another person and that the owner was neither a consenting party nor privy to the violation; (B) a forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a valid security interest at the time of seizure is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, at a hearing before the court as the trier of fact, that use of the conveyance in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 was committed by another person and that the secured party was neither a consenting party nor privy to the violation; (5) books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data, which are used in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71; (6) money, securities, negotiable instruments, or other things of value used in financial transactions derived from activity prohibited by this chapter or AS 11.71; and (7) a firearm which is visible, carried during, or used in furtherance of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.
Sec. 17.30.112.
Proceedings resulting in forfeiture.
(a) Property listing in AS 17.30.110 may be forfeited to the state either upon conviction of the defendant of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, or upon judgment of a court in a separate civil proceeding in rem.
The court may order a forfeiture in the in rem pro proceeding if it finds that an item specified in AS 17.30.110 was used during or in aid of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.
(b) It is not a defense in an in rem proceeding brought under this section that a criminal proceeding has resulted in a conviction or conviction of a lesser offense for a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.
(c) When forfeiting property under (a) of this section, a court may award to a municipal law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest or conviction of the defendant, the seizure of property, or the identification of
-45-
property for seizure, (1) the property if the property is worth $5,000 or less and is not money or some other thing that is divisible, (2) up to 75 percent of the property or the value of the property if the property is worth more than $5,000 or is money or some other thing that is divisible.
In determining the percentage a municipal law enforcement agency may receive under this subsection, the court shall consider the municipal law enforcement agency's total involvement in the case relative to the involvement of the state.
Sec. 17.30.114.
Seizure and custody of property.
(a) Property listed in AS 17.30.110 may be seized by a peace officer upon an order issued by a court having jurisdiction over the property upon under AS 17.30.110.
Seizure without a court order may be made if (1) the seizure is incident to a valid arrest or a search under a valid search warrant; (2) the property subject to seizure has been the subject of an earlier judgment in favor of the state in a criminal proceeding or civil proceeding in rem under this chapter or AS 11.71; or (3) there is probable cause that the property was used, is being used, or is intended for use, in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 and the property is easily movable; property seized under this paragraph may not be held for more than 48 hours without a court order obtained to continue its detention.
(b) Property taken or detained under (a) of this section shall be held in the custody of either the commissioner of public safety or a municipal law enforcement agency authorized by the commissioner of public safety to retain custody of property listed in AS 17.30.110 subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over any forfeiture proceedings.
If property is seized under this chapter, the commissioner of public safety or an authorized municipal law enforcement agency may (1) place the property under seal; (2) remove the property to a place designated by the court; or (3) take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law.
(4) with court approval, transfer the property to another state or federal law enforcement agency for forfeiture proceedings by that agency; the court having jurisdiction shall grant the approval under this paragraph if the property (A) will be retained within the jurisdiction of the court by the agency to which the property is being transferred; or (B) is (i) not needed as evidence; or (ii) needed as evidence, and the property is fungible or the property's evidentiary value can otherwise be preserved without retaining the property within the jurisdiction of the court.
(c) Within 10 days after a seizure under AS 17.30.110-17.30.126, the commissioner of public safety shall make an inventory of any property seized, including controlled substances, and shall appraise the value of any items seized other than controlled substances.
Sec. 17.30.116.
Procedure for forfeiture action.
(a) Within 20 days after a seizure under AS 17.30.11017.30.126, the commissioner of public safety shall, by certified mail, notify any person known to have an interest in an item with an appraised value of $500 or more, or who is ascertainable from official registration numbers, licenses, or other state, federal or municipal numbers on the item, of the pending forfeiture action.
Additionally, the commissioner of public safety shall publish notice of forfeiture action of an item valued at $500 or more in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the seizure was made, or if no newspaper is published in that judicial district, in a newspaper published in the state and distributed in that judicial district.
The notice shall be published once each week during four consecutive calendar weeks.
The requirements of this subsection do not apply to the forfeiture of controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, or possessed in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, regardless of their value.
(b) Upon service or publication of notice of commencement of a forfeiture action under this section, a person claiming interest in the property shall file within 30 days after the service or publication, a notice of claim setting out the nature of the interest, the date it was acquired, the consideration paid, and an answer to the state's allegations.
If a claim and answer is not filed within the time specified, the property described in the state's allegation must be ordered forfeited to the state without further proceedings or showings.
(c) Questions of fact or law raised by a notice of forfeiture action and answer of a claimant in an action commenced under this section must be determined by the court sitting without jury.
This proceeding may be held in abeyance until conclusion of any pen ding criminal charges against the claimant under this chapter or AS 11.71.
Sec. 17.30.118.
Petition for release of seized items.
(a) A claimant under AS 17.30.116(b) may at any time petition for release of a seized item as follows: (1) to a court in which a warrant for seizure has been issued; (2) to a court in which a criminal or civil action alleging forfeiture of the item has been filed; or (3) before an action is filed, or if no seizure warrant was issued, to a court, in the judicial district in which the violation took place.
(b) An item may not be released by the court under (a) of this section unless the claimant gives adequate assurance that the item will remain subject to the court's jurisdiction and (1) the court finds that the release is in the best interests of the state; or
-46-
item.
(2) the claimant provides a bond or other valid and equivalent security equal to twice the assessed value of the
Sec. 17.30.120.
Petition for sale of seized item.
A claimant may petition the court for sale of an item before final disposition of court proceedings.
The court shall grant a petition for sale upon a finding that the sale is in the best interests of the state and the preservation and maintenance of the item seized.
Proceeds from the sale plus interest to the date of final disposition of the court proceedings become the subject of the forfeiture action.
Sec. 17.30.122.
State disposal of forfeited property.
Property forfeited under AS 17.30.110--17.30.126 other than controlled substances and firearms shall be disposed of by the commissioner of administration in accordance with applicable law.
Firearms shall be disposed of as provided in AS 18.65.340.
As to property other than firearms or controlled substances, the commissioner of administration may (1) destroy property harmful to the public; (2) sell the property and use the proceeds for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, custody, and court costs; (3) take custody of the property and authorize its use in the enforcement of this chapter or AS 11.71, or transfer it to another agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state for a use in furtherance of the administration of justice; (4) take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law; (5) forward it to the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice for disposition; or (6) transfer ownership of an aircraft to the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol.
Sec. 17.30.124.
Remittance to claimant.
(a) Upon a showing that a claimant is entitled to remittance under AS 17.30.110-17.30.126, the court shall order that (1) if the claimant is entitled to the item, it shall be delivered to the claimant immediately; (2) if the claimant is entitled to remittance of some value less than the total value of the item, the claimant is entitled, at the claimant's choice, to receive either the value of the claimant's interest or, upon receipt of payment of the difference in value by the claimant, the entire item.
(b) An offender who used an item subject to remission in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 shall be assessed a fine which may not be less than the cost of any lien payment or remittance made by the state plus the reasonable costs of the seizure.
Sec. 17.30.126.
Forfeiture of controlled substances.
(a) A controlled substance manufactured, possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 is contraband and must be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee, including a municipal law enforcement agency authorized under AS 17.30.114(b) of this section to retain custody of controlled substances, is responsible for the disposal of controlled substances which have been forfeited.
The controlled substances shall be disposed of in accordance with procedures and requirements prescribed by the commissioner.
(b) Plants from which controlled substances may be derived and which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, or which are grown in the wild, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
ARTICLE 3.
EDUCATION AND RESEARCH Section 140.
Education and research Sec. 17.30.140.
Education and research.
(a) The commissioner of health and social services shall provide for educational programs designed to prevent and deter the abuse of controlled substances.
In connection with these programs, the commissioner may (1) assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of abuse of controlled substances; (2) promote better recognition of the problems surrounding abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations; (3) consult with interested groups and organizations to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems; (4) evaluate procedures, projects and techniques conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on abuse of controlled substances; (5) disseminate the results of research on abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of the problems which exist and their solutions; and (6) with the cooperation of the Department of Law, assist in the education and training of state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to prevent illicit traffic in and abuse of controlled substances.
-47-
(b) The commissioner of health and social services shall encourage research on controlled substances and may (1) establish methods to assess the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse; (2) make studies and undertake research to (A) develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment, and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this chapter; (B) determine patterns of abuse of controlled substances and their social effects; and (C) improve methods for preventing, predicting, and understanding the abuse of controlled substances; (3) enter into contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals for conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on abuse of controlled substances and for related research and educational activities.
ARTICLE 4.
GENERAL PROVISIONS Section 150.
Reliance on drug enforcement administration 155.
Confidentiality of certain information 900.
Definitions Sec. 17.30.150.
Reliance on drug enforcement administration.
Results, information, and evidence received from the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice relating to the enforcement functions of this chapter, including results of inspections conducted by it, may be relied on and acted on by the Department of Public Safety in the exercise of its enforcement functions under this chapter.
Sec. 17.30.155.
Confidentiality of certain information.
A practitioner engaged in medical practice or research may not disclose the name or identity of a patient or research subject that the practitioner is required to keep confidential unless ordered by a court to disclose it within the context of a criminal investigation or proceeding.
Sec. 17.30.900.
Definitions.
(a) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise the definitions set out in AS 11.71.900 apply to this chapter.
(b) [Repealed, 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]
CHAPTER 35.
MARIJUANA THERAPEUTIC RESEARCH PROGRAM [Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]
-48-
APPENDIX A STERILE PHARMACEUTICALS Scope and Purpose.
The purpose of this pamphlet is to provide standards for the preparation, labeling, and distribution of sterile products by pharmacies, pursuant to or in anticipation of a prescription drug order.
These standards are intended to apply to all sterile products, notwithstanding the location of the patient (eg. home, hospital, extended care facility, hospice, practitioner's office).
Definitions.
(a) (b) (c) (d) (e) "Biological Safety Cabinet" - a containment unit suitable for the preparation of low to moderate risk agents where there is a need for protection of the product, personnel and environment, according to National Sanitation Foundation (NSF) Standard 49.
"Class 100 Environment" - an atmospheric environment which contains less than 100 particles 0.5 microns in diameter per cubic foot of air, according to Federal Standard 209D.
"Cytotoxic" - a pharmaceutical that has the capability of killing living cells.
"Parenteral" - a sterile preparation of drugs for injection through one or more layers of the skin.
"Sterile Pharmaceutical" - dosage form free from living micro-organisms (aseptic).
Policy and Procedure Manual.
(a) (b) A policy and procedure manual is prepared and maintained for the compounding, dispensing, and delivery of sterile pharmaceutical drug orders.
The manual is reviewed and revised as necessary on an annual basis by the pharmacist-in-charge and is available for inspection at the pharmacy.
The manual includes policies and procedures, as applicable, for: (1) Clinical services; (2) Sterile product handling, preparation, dating, storage and disposal; (3) Major and minor spills of cytotoxic agents; (4) Disposal of unused supplies and medications; (5) Drug destruction and returns; (6) Drug dispensing; (7) Drug labeling; (8) Duties and qualifications for professional and nonprofessional staff; (9) Equipment use and maintenance; (10) Handling of infectious waste pertaining to drug administration; (11) Infusion devices and drug delivery systems; (12) Training and orientation of professional and non-professional staff commensurate with the services provided; (13) Dispensing of investigational medications; (14) Quality control and quality assurance; (15) Recall procedures; (16) Infection control; (17) Suspected contamination of sterile products; (18) Orientation of employees to sterile technique; (19) Sanitation; (20) Security; and (21) Transportation.
Physical Requirements.
(a) The pharmacy designates an area for the preparation of sterile products that is functionally separate from areas for the preparation of non-sterile products and is constructed to minimize traffic and airflow disturbances.
It is used only for the preparation of these specialty products.
It is of sufficient size to accommodate a laminar airflow hood and to provide for the proper storage of drugs and supplies under appropriate conditions of temperature, light, moisture, sanitation, ventilation, and security.
The pharmacy preparing parenteral products has: (1) Appropriate environmental control devices capable of maintaining at least a Class 100 environment condition in the workspace where critical objects are exposed and critical activities are performed; furthermore, these devices are capable of maintaining Class 100 environments during normal activity; (2) When cytotoxic drug products are prepared, appropriate environmental control also includes appropriate biological safety cabinets;
(b)
-49-
(c)
(d)
Sink with hot and cold running water which is convenient to the compounding area for the purpose of hand washing prior to compounding; (4) The designated area shall have hard cleanable surfaces, walls, floors and ceilings; (5) Appropriate disposal containers for used needles, syringes, etc. and if applicable, for cytotoxic waste from the preparation of chemotherapy agents and infectious wastes from patient's homes; (6) Refrigerator/freezer with thermometer; (7) Temperature controlled delivery container, if appropriate; (8) Infusion devises, if appropriate; (9) Supplies adequate to maintain an environment suitable for the aseptic preparation of sterile products.
Laminar flow hood certification (or clean room certification, if applicable) are conducted at least every six months by an independent contractor according to Federal Standard 209B or National Sanitation Foundation 49 for operational efficiency.
These reports are maintained for at least two years.
In addition, prefilters are replaced on a regular basis and the replacement date documented.
The pharmacy has current reference materials related to sterile products.
These reference materials will contain information on stability, incompatibilities, preparation guidelines, and the handling of chemotherapy drug products.
(3)
Personnel (a) (b) All personnel participating in the preparation and/or dispensing of compounded sterile pharmaceuticals are trained in this specialized function, including the principles of aseptic technique.
All duties and responsibilities of personnel are consistent with their training and experience.
Pharmacies providing parenteral products to non-hospitalized patients have a pharmacist accessible twentyfour hours per day to respond to patient's and other health professional's questions and needs.
Drug Distribution and Control.
(a) (b) In addition to labeling required for all dispensed prescription drug orders, the labeled container of a sterile pharmaceutical bears the expiration date of the preparation based upon published data.
Delivery Service.
The pharmacist-in-charge assures the environmental control of all products shipped.
Therefore, any compounded sterile pharmaceutical is shipped or delivered to a patient in appropriate temperature controlled (as defined by United States Pharmacopeia Standards) delivery containers and stored appropriately in the patient's home or outpatient location.
Disposal of Infectious/Hazardous Waste.
The pharmacist-in-charge is responsible for assuring there is a system for the disposal of cytotoxic waste and infectious waste in a manner so as not to endanger the public health.
Emergency Kit.
When sterile pharmaceuticals are provided to home care patients, the dispensing pharmacy may supply the licensed nurse with emergency drugs, if the physician has authorized the use of these drugs by a protocol for use in an emergency situation (e.g. anaphylactic shock).
(c) (d)
Cytotoxic Drugs.
The following additional requirements are necessary for those pharmacies that prepare cytotoxic drugs to assure the protection of the personnel involved: (a) All cytotoxic drugs are compounded within a vertical flow, Class II, Biological Safety Cabinet.
Policy and procedures are developed for the cleaning of the laminar airflow hood between compounding cytotoxic drugs and other parenteral products, if applicable.
(b) Protective apparel is worn by personnel compounding cytotoxic drugs.
This includes disposable gloves and gowns with tight cuffs.
(c) Appropriate safety and containment techniques for compounding cytotoxic drugs are used in conjunction with the aseptic techniques required for preparing sterile products.
(d) Disposal of cytotoxic waste complies with all applicable local, state, and federal requirements.
(e) Written procedures for handling both major and minor spills of cytotoxic agents are developed and included in the policy and procedure manual.
(f) Prepared doses of cytotoxic drugs are dispensed, labeled with proper precautions, and shipped in a manner to minimize the risk of accidental rupture of the primary container.
Patient Training.
If appropriate, the Pharmacist type of therapy provided by th patient training process in any The Pharmacist is responsible basis.
demonstrates or documents the patient's training and competency in managing the e Pharmacist to the patient in the home environment.
A pharmacist is involved in the area that relates to drug compounding, labeling, storage, stability, or incompatibility.
for seeing the patient's competency in the above areas is reassessed on an ongoing
-50-
Quality Control and Quality Assurance Procedures.
(a) Quality Control.
There is a documented, ongoing quality control program that monitors and evaluates personnel performance, equipment and facilities.
Procedures are in place to assure the pharmacy is capable of consistently preparing pharmaceuticals which are sterile and stable.
Quality control procedures include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) recall procedures; (2) storage and dating; (3) documentation of appropriate functioning of refrigerator, freezer, and other equipment; (4) documentation of aseptic environmental control device certification and the regular replacement of prefilters; (5) a process to evaluate and confirm the quality of the prepared pharmaceutical product; and (6) if bulk compounding of parenteral solutions is performed utilizing non-sterile chemicals, extensive end product testing is documented prior to the release of the product from quarantine.
This process includes appropriate tests for particulate matter and pyrogens.
Quality Assurance.
(1) (2) (3) (4) There is a documented, ongoing quality assurance program for monitoring and evaluating personnel performance and patient outcomes to assure efficient drug delivery, patient safety, and positive patient outcomes.
There is documentation of quality assurance audits at regular, planned intervals which may include infection control, sterile technique, delivery systems/times, order transcription accuracy, drug administration systems, adverse drug reactions, and drug therapy appropriateness.
A plan for corrective action of problems identified by quality assurance audits is developed which includes procedures for the documentation of identified problems and action taken.
A periodic evaluation of the effectiveness of the quality assurance activities is completed and documented.
(b)
-51-
APPENDIX B FACILITY STANDARDS FOR PHARMACIES General Requirements.
(a) (b) (c) (d) (e) (f) Each pharmacy is of sufficient size to allow for the safe and proper storage of prescription drugs and for the safe and proper compounding and/or preparation of prescription drug orders.
There is a minimum of three linear feet by a minimum of 18 inches in depth of counter working space for each pharmacist or intern compounding or filling prescriptions at the same time.
The prescription department and all areas where drugs are stored are well lighted, well ventilated, dry, and maintained in a clean and orderly condition.
Walls, floors, ceilings, and windows are clean and in general good repair and order.
Each pharmacy has a sink with hot and cold running water within the pharmacy and maintained in a sanitary condition.
There are refrigeration facilities with a thermometer in the prescription department for the proper storage of drugs requiring refrigeration.
Temperatures in the refrigerator are maintained within United States Pharmacopeia standards.
The temperature of the pharmacy is maintained within a range compatible with the proper storage of drugs.
Equipment and Supplies.
(a) (b) All pharmacies have in their possession the equipment and supplies necessary to compound, dispense, label, administer and distribute drugs and devices.
The equipment is in good repair and is available in sufficient quantity to meet the needs of the practice of pharmacy conducted therein.
All equipment is kept in a clean and orderly manner.
Equipment used in the compounding or preparation of prescription drug orders (counting, weighing, measuring, mixing, stirring, and molding equipment) is clean and in good repair.
Library.
A reference library is maintained which includes the following: (1) A current copy of the Alaska Pharmacy Statutes and Regulations.
(2) At least one current or updated reference (hard-copy or electronic media) from each of the following categories: (A) Patient information.
(i) USP Dispensing Information, Volume II (Advice to the Patient); or (ii) Patient Drug Facts; or (iii) reference text or information leaflets which provide patient information.
(B) General information.
(i) Facts and Comparisons; or (ii) USP Dispensing Information, Volume I (Drug Information for the Healthcare Provider); or (iii) AHFS Drug Information; or (iv) Remington's Pharmaceutical Sciences, and (3) The telephone number of the nearest poison control center is readily available.
-52-
APPENDIX C GOOD COMPOUNDING PRACTICES (a) A pharmacist may compound drugs in limited quantities before receiving a valid prescription drug order if the pharmacist has a historical basis of valid prescription drug orders generated solely within an established relationship between the pharmacist, a patient, and a prescribing practitioner for the amount of drugs compounded.
Compounding drugs in an amount above that for which there is a historical basis is considered manufacturing.
Compounding includes the preparation (1) according to a prescription drug order of drugs or devices that are not commercially available; (2) of commercially available products from bulk when the prescribing practitioner has prescribed the compounded product on a per prescription basis and the patient has been made aware that the compounded product will be prepared by the pharmacist.
When a compounded product is to be substituted for a commercially available product, both the patient and the prescribing practitioner must authorize the use of the compounded product.
The pharmacist shall document these authorizations on the prescription drug order or in the computerized patient medication record.
The prescribing practitioner's authorization is in addition to signing to permit substitution on a prescription drug order or advising verbally that substitution is permitted.
The reconstitution of commercially available products according to the manufacturer's guidelines is permissible without notice to the prescribing practitioner.
A pharmacist may not offer compounded drug products to prescribing practitioners, pharmacists, or pharmacies for resale except in the course of professional practice for a prescribing practitioner to administer to an individual patient.
The distribution of inordinate amounts of compounded products without a relationship between the pharmacist and the prescribing practitioner and patient is considered manufacturing.
A pharmacist may receive, store, and use drug substances for compounding prescriptions that meet official compendia requirements.
A pharmacist shall use the pharmacist's professional judgment to receive, store, and use drug substances for compounding prescriptions not found in official compendia.
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
PERSONNEL A pharmacist engaging in compounding shall maintain proficiency through current awareness and training.
Continuing education should include training in the art and science of compounding and the rules and regulations of compounding.
COMPOUNDING FACILITIES (a) (b) (c) A pharmacy engaging in compounding shall have a specifically designated and adequate area for the orderly compounding of prescriptions that is maintained in a good state of repair and for the placement of materials and equipment.
Bulk medications and other chemicals or materials used in the compounding of medications must be stored in adequately labeled containers in a clean, dry, and temperature controlled area or, if required, under proper refrigeration.
Adequate lighting and ventilation must be provided in all drug compounding areas.
Potable water must be supplied under continuous positive pressure in a plumbing system free of defects that could contribute contamination to any compounded drug product.
Adequate washing facilities, easily accessible to the compounding area of the pharmacy must be provided.
The facilities must include hot and cold water, soap or detergent, and air-driers or single use towels.
The area used for the compounding of drugs must be maintained in a clean and sanitary condition.
It must be free of infestation by insects, rodents, and other vermin.
Trash must be held and disposed of in a timely and sanitary manner.
Sewage and other refuse must be disposed of in a safe and sanitary manner.
If drug products with special precautions for contamination, such as penicillin, are involved in a compounding procedure, appropriate measures, including either the dedication of equipment or meticulous cleaning of contaminated equipment prior to its use for the preparation of other drugs, must be used in order to prevent cross-contamination.
(d) (e)
RECORDS AND REPORTS (a) (b) (c) A pharmacist shall keep records of all compounded products for two years.
The records must be readily available for authorized inspection at the pharmacy.
A pharmacist shall ensure that there are formulas maintained electronically or manually.
A formula must include ingredients, amounts, methodology and equipment, if needed, and special information regarding sterile compounding.
A pharmacy engaging in compounding must have written procedures for the compounding of drugs to assure that the finished products have the identity, strength, quality, and purity they are represented to
-53-
(d)
(e)
(f) (g)
(h)
possess.
The procedures must include a listing of the components, their amounts in weight or volume, the order of component mixing, and a description of the compounding process.
The procedures must list all equipment and utensils and the container or closure system relevant to the sterility and stability of the intended use of the drug.
The procedures must be followed in the execution of the drug compounding procedure.
A pharmacist shall accurately weigh, measure, or subdivide as appropriate the components for drug product compounding.
The compounding pharmacist shall check these operations at each stage of the compounding process to ensure that each weight or measure is correct as stated in the written compounding procedures.
If a component is transferred from the original container to another container, the new container must be identified with the component name and the weight or measure.
To assure the reasonable uniformity and integrity of compounded drug products, written procedures must be established and followed that describe the tests or examinations to be conducted on the product compounded.
The control procedures must be established to monitor the output and to validate the performance of those compounding processes that include the following when appropriate: (1) capsule weight variation; (2) adequacy of mixing to assure uniformity and homogeneity; (3) clarity, completeness, or pH of solutions; A pharmacy engaging in compounding shall establish and follow appropriate written procedures designed to prevent microbiological contamination of compounded drug products purporting to be sterile.
The procedures must include validation of any sterilization process.
For the purpose of compounding in quantities larger than required for immediate dispensing by a prescriber or for future dispensing upon prescription, a pharmacy shall maintain records that include (1) the date of preparation; (2) the lot number - the lot numbers may be the manufacturer's lot numbers or new numbers assigned by the pharmacy.
If a lot number is assigned by the pharmacy, the pharmacy shall record the original manufacturer's lot numbers and expiration dates, if known.
If the original manufacturer's lot numbers and expiration dates are not known, the pharmacy shall record the source and acquisition date of the components; (3) the expiration date of the finished product - this date may not exceed 180 days or the shortest expiration date of any component in the finished product unless a longer date is supported by stability studies in the same type of packaging as furnished to the prescriber or to be stored in until dispensing.
Shorter dating than set forth in this subsection may be used if it is deemed appropriate in the professional judgment of the responsible pharmacist; (4) the signature or initials of the pharmacist performing the compounding; (5) initials of the person preparing each process; (6) initials of the pharmacist supervising each process; (7) a formula for the compounded product maintained in a readily retrievable form; (8) the name of the manufacturer of the raw materials; (9) the quantity in units of finished products or grams of raw materials; and (10) the package size and the number of units prepared.
"Component" means any ingredient intended for use in the compounding of a drug product, including those that may not appear in the product.
-54-
